Maryland, session 2025, SB0937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–701(h–1) and (i) of Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–701(i–1) of
Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s)
7–701(i).
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–637.
(b) A member–regulated cooperative is subject to the following provisions of the
Public Utilities Article:
(1) § 4–212;
(2) § 5–103;
[(2)] (3) § 5–201;
[(3)] (4) § 5–202;
[(4)] (5) § 5–303;
[(5)] (6) § 5–304;
[(6)] (7) § 5–306;
[(7)] (8) § 7–103;
[(8)] (9) § 7–104;
[(9)] (10) § 7–203;
[(10)] (11) § 7–207;
[(11)] (12) Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II;
[(12)] (13) § 7–302;
[(13)] (14) Title 7, Subtitle 5, Part I and Part II;
[(14)] (15) Title 7, Subtitle 7; and
[(15)] (16) § 13–101.
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–211.
– 5 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Covered building” has the meaning stated in § 2–1601 of the
Environment Article.
(iii) “Energy conservation project” means a project that qualifies
under § 4–218 of this subtitle.
(2) For the purpose of reducing direct greenhouse gas emissions from
multifamily residential buildings in accordance with the standards adopted under § 2–1602
of the Environment Article, the Administration shall develop and implement a program to
provide grants AND LOANS for energy conservation projects and projects to install
renewable energy generating systems in covered buildings that house primarily low– to
moderate–income households.
(3) Grants AND LOANS provided under this subsection may not be used for
a project to install new equipment that uses fossil fuels or improve the efficiency of existing
equipment that uses fossil fuels.
(4) In each of fiscal years 2024 through 2026, the Governor shall include in
the annual budget bill an appropriation of $5,000,000 to the Department for the purpose of
providing grants AND LOANS under this subsection.
(5) On or before December 1, 2023, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Administration shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on the projects funded under this subsection.
Article – Public Utilities
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “Electric company” means a person who physically transmits or
distributes electricity in the State to a retail electric customer.
(2) “Electric company” does not include:
(i) the following persons who supply electricity and electricity
supply services solely to occupants of a building for use by the occupants:
1. an owner/operator who holds ownership in and manages
the internal distribution system serving the building; or
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
2. a lessee/operator who holds a leasehold interest in and
manages the internal distribution system serving the building;
(ii) any person who generates on–site generated electricity; [or]
(iii) a person who transmits or distributes electricity within a site
owned by the person or the person’s affiliate that is incidental to a primarily
landlord–tenant relationship; OR
(IV) A PERSON WHO PROVIDES ELECTRICITY TO A LARGE LOAD
COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–506.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(l) (1) “Electricity supplier” means a person:
(i) who sells:
1. electricity;
2. electricity supply services;
3. competitive billing services; or
4. competitive metering services; or
(ii) who purchases, brokers, arranges, or markets electricity or
electricity supply services for sale to a retail electric customer.
(2) “Electricity supplier” includes an electric company, an aggregator, a
broker, [and] a marketer of electricity, AND A PERSON WHO PROVIDES ELECTRICITY TO
A LARGE LOAD COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
7–506.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “Electricity supplier” does not include:
(i) the following persons who supply electricity and electricity
supply services solely to occupants of a building for use by the occupants:
1. an owner/operator who holds ownership in and manages
the internal distribution system serving the building; or
2. a lessee/operator who holds a leasehold interest in and
manages the internal distribution system serving the building;
(ii) a person who generates on–site generated electricity; or
– 7 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) a person that owns or operates equipment used for charging
electric vehicles, including a person that owns or operates:
1. an electric vehicle charging station;
2. electric vehicle supply equipment; or
3. an electric vehicle charging station service company or
provider.
(W–1) “PJM INTERCONNECTION” OR, “PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC”
MEANS, OR “PJM” MEANS PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC OR ANY SUCCESSOR
ORGANIZATION THAT SERVICES THE PJM REGION.
(W–2) “PJM REGION” MEANS THE CONTROL AREA ADMINISTERED BY PJM
INTERCONNECTION, AS THE AREA MAY CHANGE FROM TIME TO TIME.
(ee) (1) “Retail electric customer” means a purchaser of electricity for end use
in the State.
(2) “Retail electric customer” includes:
(i) a person that owns or operates equipment used for charging
electric vehicles, including:
1. an electric vehicle charging station;
2. electric vehicle supply equipment; or
3. an electric vehicle charging station service company or
provider; [and]
(ii) a person that charges an electric vehicle at an electric vehicle
charging station that the person owns or operates; AND
(III) A LARGE LOAD COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER
THAT PURCHASES ELECTRICITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–506.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “Retail electric customer” does not include:
(i) an occupant of a building in which the owner/operator or
lessee/operator manages the internal distribution system serving the building and supplies
electricity and electricity supply services solely to occupants of the building for use by the
occupants;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(ii) a person who generates on–site generated electricity, to the
extent the on–site generated electricity is consumed by that person or its tenants; or
(iii) except as provided in paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection, a
person that charges an electric vehicle at an electric vehicle charging station.
4–206.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY THAT IS
AN INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY OR INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(B) IN A BASE RATE PROCEEDING TO SET JUST AND REASONABLE RATES
UNDER THIS TITLE, EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL DEMONSTRATE TO THE
COMMISSION THE REASONABLENESS OF THE USE OF INTERNAL LABOR IN
COMPARISON TO CONTRACTUAL LABOR.
(C) TO DEMONSTRATE REASONABLENESS OF THE USE OF LABOR AS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
SHALL PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION, AT A MINIMUM:
(1) EVIDENCE THAT THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY LACKS THE
CAPACITY TO SELF–PERFORM THE CONTRACTED WORK USING INTERNAL LABOR;
(2) A JUSTIFICATION FOR THE USE OF CONTRACTUAL LABOR WHEN
USED INSTEAD OF INTERNAL LABOR, INCLUDING A COST–BASED RATIONALE THAT:
(I) COMPARES THE COSTS OF INTERNAL LABOR WITH THE
COSTS OF CONTRACTUAL LABOR; AND
(II) DEMONSTRATES THE REASONABLENESS OF THE DECISION
TO USE CONTRACTUAL LABOR; AND
(3) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSION REQUIRES.
(C) TO DEMONSTRATE REASONABLENESS OF THE USE OF LABOR AS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
SHALL PROVIDE TO THE COMMISSION, AT A MINIMUM:
(1) A COMPARISON OF THE COSTS OF INTERNAL LABOR AND
CONTRACTUAL LABOR;
(2) A DEMONSTRATION OF THE REASONABLENESS OF THE DECISION
TO USE CONTRACTUAL LABOR;
– 9 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A JUSTIFICATION FOR THE USE OF CONTRACTUAL LABOR WHEN
USED INSTEAD OF INTERNAL LABOR, INCLUDING A COST–BASED RATIONALE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSION REQUIRES.
4–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Customer” means a retail natural gas customer.
(3) “Eligible infrastructure replacement” means a replacement or an
improvement in an existing infrastructure of a gas company that:
(i) is made on or after June 1, 2013;
(ii) is designed to improve public safety or infrastructure reliability;
(iii) does not increase the revenue of a gas company by connecting an
improvement directly to new customers;
(iv) reduces or has the potential to reduce greenhouse gas emissions
through a reduction in natural gas system leaks; and
(v) is not included in the current rate base of the gas company as
determined in the gas company’s most recent base rate proceeding.
(4) “Plan” means a plan that a gas company files under subsection [(d)] (E)
of this section.
(5) “Project” means an eligible infrastructure replacement project proposed
by a gas company in a plan filed under this section.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the purpose of this section is to
[accelerate] ALLOW FOR THE APPROPRIATE ACCELERATION OF gas infrastructure
improvements in the State [by establishing a mechanism for gas companies to promptly
recover reasonable and prudent costs of investments in eligible infrastructure replacement
projects separate from base rate proceedings] WHEN:
(1) NECESSARY TO ENSURE SAFETY AND IMPROVE RELIABILITY; AND
(2) CONSISTENT WITH STATE POLICY.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER A GAS
COMPANY’S OBLIGATION UNDER THIS DIVISION TO MAKE IMPROVEMENTS TO A GAS
SYSTEM THAT ARE NECESSARY TO ENSURE THE SAFETY OF THE GAS SYSTEM.
[(c)] (D) This section does not apply to a gas cooperative.
[(d)] (E) (1) A gas company may file with the Commission:
(i) a plan to invest in eligible infrastructure replacement projects;
and
(ii) in accordance with paragraph [(4)] (5) of this subsection, a
cost–recovery schedule associated with the plan that includes a fixed annual surcharge on
customer bills to recover reasonable and prudent costs of proposed eligible infrastructure
replacement projects.
(2) A plan under this subsection shall include:
(i) A DESCRIPTION OF EACH ELIGIBLE INFRASTRUCTURE
REPLACEMENT PROJECT, INCLUDING THE PROJECT’S EXPECTED USEFUL LIFE;
(II) a time line for the completion of each eligible project;
[(ii)] (III) the estimated cost of each project;
[(iii)] (IV) a description of customer benefits under the plan; [and]
(V) A DEMONSTRATION THAT THE GAS COMPANY HAS SELECTED
AND GIVEN PRIORITY TO PROJECTS BASED ON RISK TO THE PUBLIC AND
COST–EFFECTIVENESS;
(VI) AN ANALYSIS THAT COMPARES THE COSTS OF PROPOSED
REPLACEMENT PROJECTS WITH ALTERNATIVES TO REPLACEMENT, INCLUDING
LEAK DETECTION AND REPAIR;
(VII) A PLAN FOR NOTIFYING CUSTOMERS AFFECTED BY
PROPOSED PROJECTS AT LEAST 6 MONTHS IN ADVANCE OF CONSTRUCTION; AND
[(iv)] (VIII) any other information the Commission considers
necessary to evaluate the plan.
(3) A CUSTOMER NOTIFICATION PLAN REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PROVIDE FOR:
– 11 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) AN INITIAL NOTIFICATION OF CONSTRUCTION IN A MANNER
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
(II) AT LEAST TWO SUBSEQUENT NOTIFICATIONS OF
CONSTRUCTION IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION; AND
(III) THE COMMUNICATING OF A COMPLETE AND ACCURATE
DESCRIPTION OF PROJECT ACTIVITIES; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS
NECESSARY TO EVALUATE THE PLAN.
(III) THE COMMUNICATING OF:
1. A COMPLETE AND ACCURATE DESCRIPTION OF
PROJECT ACTIVITIES; AND
2. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS NECESSARY TO EVALUATE THE PLAN.
[(3)] (4) (i) When calculating the estimated cost of a project under
paragraph (2) of this subsection, a gas company shall include:
1. the pretax rate of return on the gas company’s investment
in the project;
2. depreciation associated with the project, based on new
assets less retired plant; and
3. property taxes associated with the project, based on new
assets less retired plant.
(ii) The estimated project costs described in subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph are collectible at the same time the eligible infrastructure replacement is made.
(iii) The pretax rate of return under subparagraph (i)1 of this
paragraph shall:
1. be calculated using the gas company’s capital structure
and weighted average cost of capital as the Commission approved in the gas company’s
most recent base rate proceeding; and
2. include an adjustment for bad debt expenses as the
Commission approved in the gas company’s most recent base rate proceeding.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
[(4)] (5) For a plan filed under this section:
(i) the cost–recovery schedule shall include a fixed annual
surcharge that:
1. may not exceed $2 each month on each residential
customer account; and
2. for each nonresidential customer account, may not be less
than the fixed annual surcharge applicable to a residential customer account, but shall be
capped under item (ii) of this paragraph; and
(ii) to create a surcharge cap for all customer classes, costs shall be
allocated to nonresidential and residential customers consistent with the proportions of
total distribution revenues that those classes bear in accordance with the most recent base
rate proceeding for the gas company.
(6) FOR A GAS COMPANY TO RECOVER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
ELIGIBLE INFRASTRUCTURE REPLACEMENT PROJECTS, A PLAN SHALL
DEMONSTRATE:
(I) CUSTOMER BENEFITS; AND
(II) THAT THE GAS COMPANY HAS:
1. ANALYZED AVAILABLE COST–EFFECTIVE OPTIONS TO
DEFER, REDUCE, OR REMOVE THE NEED TO REPLACE, CONSTRUCT, OR UPGRADE
COMPONENTS OF THE GAS COMPANY’S DISTRIBUTION INFRASTRUCTURE,
INCLUDING LEAK DETECTION AND REPAIR; AND
2. MET ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY
THE COMMISSION WHEN SETTING RATES UNDER THIS TITLE.
(7) A PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE FILED SEPARATELY
FROM A BASE RATE PROCEEDING.
[(5)] (8) In a base rate proceeding after approval of a plan, the
Commission shall, in establishing a gas company’s revenue requirements, take into account
any benefits the gas company realized as a result of a surcharge approved under the plan.
[(6)] (9) Any adjustment for return on equity based on an approved plan
only shall be considered and determined in a subsequently filed base rate case.
[(e)] (F) (1) Within 180 days after a gas company files a plan, the
Commission:
– 13 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) may hold a public hearing on the plan; and
(ii) shall take a final action to approve or deny the plan.
(2) Within 150 days after a gas company files an amendment to an
approved plan, the Commission shall take final action to approve or deny the amendment.
(3) The Commission may approve a plan if it finds that the investments
and estimated costs of eligible infrastructure replacement projects are:
(i) reasonable and prudent; [and]
(ii) designed to improve public safety or infrastructure reliability
over the short term and long term; AND
(III) REQUIRED TO IMPROVE THE SAFETY OF THE GAS SYSTEM
AFTER CONSIDERATION OF ALTERNATIVES TO REPLACEMENT.
(4) (i) The Commission shall approve the cost–recovery schedule
associated with the plan at the same time that it approves the plan.
(ii) Costs recovered under the schedule approved in subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph may relate only to the projects within the plan approved by the
Commission.
(5) The Commission may not consider a revenue requirement or
rate–making issue that is not related to the plan when reviewing a plan for approval or
denial unless the plan is filed in conjunction with a base rate case.
[(f)] (G) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the Commission
does not take final action on a plan within the time period required under subsection [(e)]
(F) of this section, the gas company may implement the plan.
(2) If a gas company implements a plan that the Commission has not
approved, the gas company shall refund to customers any amount of the surcharge that the
Commission later determines is not reasonable or prudent, including interest.
(H) THE COMMISSION MAY AUTHORIZE A GAS COMPANY TO USE A
MECHANISM TO PROMPTLY RECOVER REASONABLE AND PRUDENT COSTS OF
INVESTMENTS FOR ELIGIBLE INFRASTRUCTURE REPLACEMENT PROJECTS THAT:
(1) ARE PART OF A PLAN APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION OR
IMPLEMENTED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION; AND
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(2) ACCELERATE GAS INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS IN THE
STATE.
[(g)] (I) (1) (i) A surcharge under this section shall be in effect for 5 years
from the date of initial implementation of an approved plan.
(ii) 1. Before the end of the 5–year period, the gas company shall
file a base rate case application.
2. In a base rate proceeding filed under subsubparagraph 1
of this subparagraph, if a plan approved by the Commission remains in effect:
A. eligible infrastructure project costs included in base rates
in accordance with a final Commission order on the base rate case shall be removed from a
surcharge; and
B. the surcharge mechanism shall continue for eligible future
infrastructure project costs that are not included in the base rate case.
(2) (i) If the actual cost of a plan is less than the amount collected under
a surcharge, the gas company shall refund to customers the difference on customer bills,
including interest.
(ii) If the actual cost of a plan is more than the amount collected
under the surcharge and the Commission determines that the higher costs were reasonably
and prudently incurred, the Commission shall authorize the gas company to increase the
surcharge to recover the difference, subject to the rate limit under subsection [(d)(4)] (E)(5)
of this section.
[(h)] (J) Each year a gas company shall file with the Commission a reconciliation
to adjust the amount of a surcharge to account for any difference between the actual cost
of a plan and the actual amount recovered under the surcharge.
[(i)] (K) If, after approving a surcharge in a plan, the Commission establishes
new base rates for the gas company that include costs on which the surcharge is based, the
gas company shall file a revised rate schedule with the Commission that subtracts those
costs from the surcharge.
[(j)] (L) (1) The Commission may review a previously approved plan.
(2) If the Commission determines that an investment of a project or cost of
a project no longer meets the requirements of subsection [(e)(3)] (F)(3) of this section, the
Commission may:
(i) reduce future base rates or surcharges; or
– 15 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) alter or rescind approval of that part of the plan.
4–212.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTRACT CAPACITY” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF MONTHLY PEAK
LOAD REQUIREMENTS:
(I) THAT IS MUTUALLY AGREED TO BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY
AND A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER FOR EACH MONTH REMAINING IN A CONTRACT TERM
AFTER THE LOAD RAMP PERIOD HAS ENDED; AND
(II) FOR WHICH:
1. THE ELECTRIC COMPANY AGREES TO PROVIDE ALL OF
THE COMPONENTS OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE SUBJECT TO THE TERMS AND
CONDITIONS IN ITS TARIFFS; AND
2. THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER AGREES TO PURCHASE
SERVICE AT THAT LOAD LEVEL FOR THE STATED TERM OF THE CONTRACT AND
UNDER THE SAME TERMS AND CONDITIONS AS THOSE STATED IN THE CONTRACT.
(3) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” MEANS A COMMERCIAL OR
INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER FOR RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE THAT:
(I) HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE MONTHLY
DEMAND OF AT LEAST 100 MEGAWATTS; AND
(II) HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE A LOAD FACTOR OF OVER
80%.
(4) “LOAD RAMP PERIOD” MEANS THE PERIOD OF TIME FROM
COMMENCEMENT OF SERVICE UNTIL A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S BILLING
CALCULATION IS BASED ON THE FULL CONTRACT CAPACITY.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT RESIDENTIAL
RETAIL ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS IN THE STATE SHOULD NOT BEAR THE FINANCIAL
RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS INTERCONNECTING TO THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE.
(C) (1) (I) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, EACH ELECTRIC
COMPANY INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY AND EACH ELECTRIC
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
COOPERATIVE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL A SPECIFIC
RATE SCHEDULE FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS THAT ACCOMPLISHES THE INTENT
OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) EACH MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC UTILITY THAT RECEIVES AN
APPLICATION FOR RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE FROM A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE
FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS.
(2) (I) SERVICE UNDER A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE SHALL BE
AVAILABLE TO LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS THAT WILL USE, WITHIN THE INITIAL
CONTRACT TERM:
1. A MONTHLY MAXIMUM DEMAND OF MORE THAN 100
MEGAWATTS AT A SINGLE LOCATION; OR
2. AN AGGREGATED CONTRACT CAPACITY IN THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY OF MORE THAN 100 MEGAWATTS.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS THAT QUALIFY FOR A SPECIFIC RATE
SCHEDULE AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THAT SCHEDULE:
1. SHALL TAKE SERVICE UNDER THE SPECIFIC RATE
SCHEDULE; AND
2. MAY NOT BE ALLOWED TO TAKE SERVICE UNDER ANY
OTHER EXISTING SCHEDULE.
(III) A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE DOES NOT APPLY TO THE
FACILITY OF AN EXISTING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT HAS SIGNED A SERVICE
AGREEMENT BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE SCHEDULE IF:
1. THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S EXISTING LOAD DOES
NOT EXPAND BY MORE THAN 25 MEGAWATTS AT THAT FACILITY UNDER THE
EXISTING SERVICE AGREEMENT; OR
2. THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER DOES NOT SIGN A NEW
SERVICE AGREEMENT TO EXPAND THE FACILITY’S LOAD BY MORE THAN 25
MEGAWATTS ABOVE THE CONTRACT CAPACITY OF THE EXISTING SERVICE
AGREEMENT.
– 17 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION ON WHETHER TO APPROVE A SPECIFIC
RATE SCHEDULE SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER THE RATE SCHEDULE:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, REQUIRES A
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO COVER THE JUST AND REASONABLE COSTS ASSOCIATED
WITH ANY ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM BUILDOUT
REQUIRED TO:
(I) INTERCONNECT THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE; OR
(II) SERVE THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER;
(2) PROTECTS ELECTRIC SYSTEM RELIABILITY, INCLUDING
PROTECTING ELECTRIC SYSTEM RELIABILITY RESIDENTIAL RETAIL ELECTRIC
CUSTOMERS FROM THE FINANCIAL RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMERS THROUGH THE USE OF:
(I) LOAD RAMP PERIODS;
(II) MINIMUM BILLING DEMAND FOR ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
AND TRANSMISSION SERVICE THAT IS A HIGH PERCENTAGE OF A LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER’S CONTRACT CAPACITY;
(III) LONG–TERM CONTRACTUAL COMMITMENTS AND EXIT FEES;
(IV) GUARANTEE OR COLLATERAL REQUIREMENTS; AND
(V) PENALTIES AND REIMBURSEMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR
THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER DELAYS OR CANCELS
A PROJECT AFTER THE ELECTRIC COMPANY HAS BEGUN BUILDOUT TO
ACCOMMODATE THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER; AND
(3) SUFFICIENTLY ENSURES THAT THE ALLOCATION OF COSTS TO
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS UNDER THE SCHEDULE DOES NOT RESULT IN CUSTOMERS
THAT ARE NOT LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS UNREASONABLY SUBSIDIZING THE COSTS
OF LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS UNDER THE SCHEDULE.
(E) THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH ANY ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION OR
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM BUILDOUT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BE PAID OVER MULTIPLE YEARS OF A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S
CONTRACT FOR SERVICE, NOT TO EXCEED 5 YEARS.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(F) (E) BEFORE SIGNING A CONTRACT FOR SERVICE UNDER A SPECIFIC
RATE SCHEDULE SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMER UNDER THE SCHEDULE IS REQUIRED TO:
(1) SUBMIT A REQUEST FOR A LOAD STUDY TO DETERMINE THE
NECESSARY CONTRACT CAPACITY FOR THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER AND PAY ANY
APPLICABLE FEES ASSOCIATED WITH THE STUDY;
(2) DESIGNATE A SPECIFIC SITE WHERE THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER’S PROJECT WILL BE CONSTRUCTED AND SERVED BY THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY;
(3) OWN OR HAVE THE EXCLUSIVE RIGHT TO USE THE LAND
DESIGNATED IN ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE PROJECT; AND
(4) MEET ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED UNDER THE RATE
SCHEDULE.
(G) (F) (1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH MINIMUM NOTICE REQUIREMENTS AND
DEADLINES RELATED TO LOAD STUDY REQUESTS AND CONTRACT TERMINATIONS
AND ADJUSTMENTS;
(II) IF CONSIDERED NECESSARY BY THE COMMISSION, SPECIFY
COMMON FORMS OF ACCEPTABLE COLLATERAL TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(III) ESTABLISH DEADLINES RELATED TO COMPLETION OF LOAD
STUDIES AND PAYMENT OF FEES.
4–213.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY THAT IS
AN ELECTRIC COMPANY, GAS COMPANY, OR COMBINATION GAS AND ELECTRIC
COMPANY.
(B) (1) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY MAY FILE A MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN
FOR DISTRIBUTION RATES.
– 19 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) SHALL DEMONSTRATE THAT THE PLAN IS IN THE PUBLIC
INTEREST; AND
(II) MAY NOT ALLOW FOR THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY TO
FILE FOR RECONCILIATION OF COST OR REVENUE VARIANCES THAT DIFFER FROM
THE FORECASTS USED BY THE COMMISSION TO ESTABLISH THE JUST AND
REASONABLE RATE.
(C) UNLESS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY LAW, THE COMMISSION MAY
APPROVE THE USE OF A MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) UNLESS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY LAW, THE COMMISSION MAY
APPROVE THE USE OF A MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN FOR DISTRIBUTION BASE RATES
ONLY IF THE PLAN:
(1) DEMONSTRATES THE CUSTOMER BENEFITS OF THE INVESTMENT;
AND
(2) DOES NOT ALLOW FOR THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY TO FILE
FOR RECONCILIATION OF COST OR REVENUE VARIANCES OF THE APPROVED
REVENUE COMPONENT USED BY THE COMMISSION TO ESTABLISH JUST AND
REASONABLE RATES.
(C) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY THAT FILES OR HAS FILED AN APPLICATION
FOR A MULTIYEAR RATE PLAN MAY NOT SUBSEQUENTLY FILE FOR RECONCILIATION
OF COST OR REVENUE VARIANCES OF THE APPROVED REVENUE COMPONENT USED
BY THE COMMISSION TO ESTABLISH THE MULTIYEAR RATES UNLESS THE FILING FOR
RECONCILIATION WAS MADE ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025.
4–214.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NONPIPELINE ALTERNATIVE” MEANS AN
INVESTMENT OR ACTIVITY THAT DEFERS, REDUCES, OR ELIMINATES THE NEED TO
CONSTRUCT A NEW GAS PIPELINE.
(B) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO RESTRICT AN
INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY’S ABILITY TO MAKE IMPROVEMENTS TO ITS GAS
SYSTEM TO ENSURE THE SAFE AND RELIABLE OPERATION OF THE SYSTEM.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(C) AN INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY MAY RECOVER REASONABLE AND
PRUDENT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH A PLANNED GAS INFRASTRUCTURE
INVESTMENT FOR A PLANNED PIPELINE REPLACEMENT IF THE INVESTOR–OWNED
GAS COMPANY DEMONSTRATES AT A RATE SETTING PROCEEDING:
(1) THE CUSTOMER BENEFITS OF THE INVESTMENT;
(2) THAT THE INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY ANALYZED
COST–EFFECTIVE OPTIONS THAT ACHIEVE SAFETY BENEFITS COMPARABLE TO THE
INVESTMENTS AND AVAILABLE TO DEFER, REDUCE, OR ELIMINATE THE NEED TO
REPLACE, UPGRADE, OR CONSTRUCT NEW COMPONENTS, INCLUDING AN ANALYSIS
OF:
(I) FOR NEW INVESTMENTS UNRELATED TO SAFETY,
NONPIPELINE ALTERNATIVES; AND
(II) LEAK DETECTION AND REPAIR; AND
(3) THE ESTIMATED RISK REDUCTION ASSOCIATED WITH A
SAFETY–RELATED INVESTMENT, IF APPLICABLE.
4–504.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY THAT IS
AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY, GAS COMPANY, OR COMBINATION GAS
AND ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(B) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY MAY NOT RECOVER THROUGH RATES ANY
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH:
(1) MEMBERSHIP, DUES, SPONSORSHIPS, OR CONTRIBUTIONS TO AN
INDUSTRY TRADE ASSOCIATION, GROUP, OR RELATED ENTITY EXEMPT FROM
TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(6) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; OR
(2) THE ACQUISITION, USE, OR ALLOCATION OF COSTS ASSOCIATED
WITH A PRIVATE PLANE THAT IS OWNED OR LEASED BY THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY OR ITS HOLDING COMPANY.
5–305.
(a) This section applies to a project by an investor–owned gas company, electric
company, or combination gas and electric company involving the construction,
reconstruction, installation, demolition, restoration, or alteration of any underground gas
or electric infrastructure of the company, and any related traffic control activities.
– 21 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) An investor–owned gas company, electric company, or combination gas and
electric company shall require a contractor or subcontractor on a project described in
subsection (a) of this section to pay its employees not less than the prevailing wage rate
determined solely by the Commissioner of Labor and Industry in a process substantially
similar to the process established under Title 17, Subtitle 2 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(c) In accordance with Title 3, Subtitle 5 of the Labor and Employment Article,
the Maryland Department of Labor shall enforce the requirement under subsection (b) of
this section for contractors and subcontractors to pay employees not less than the prevailing
wage rate determined solely by the Commissioner of Labor and Industry.
(D) A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO AFTER MARCH 1, 2024, BY AN
INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY, ELECTRIC COMPANY, OR COMBINATION GAS AND
ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT IS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION,
INSTALLATION, DEMOLITION, RESTORATION, OR ALTERATION OF ANY
UNDERGROUND GAS OR ELECTRIC INFRASTRUCTURE, AND ANY RELATED TRAFFIC
CONTROL ACTIVITIES, INCLUDES A CONTRACT THAT HAS BEEN EXECUTED,
AMENDED, OR ALTERED AFTER MARCH 1, 2024.
7–211.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT IT IS THE POLICY
OF THE STATE TO ENCOURAGE THE DEVELOPMENT OF CLEAN, CARBON–FREE
NUCLEAR POWER, INCLUDING DEVELOPMENT THROUGH INNOVATIVE DESIGNS.
(B) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION, IN COORDINATION WITH
THE COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, SHALL
PURSUE:
(1) COST–SHARING AGREEMENTS WITH NEIGHBORING STATES IN THE
PJM REGION TO MITIGATE THE RISKS OF DEVELOPING NEW NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATIONS; AND
(2) AGREEMENTS WITH FEDERAL AGENCIES REGARDING THE SITING
OF SMALL MODULAR REACTORS:
(I) ON FEDERAL LAND; OR
(II) ON OR NEAR FEDERAL FACILITIES, INCLUDING MILITARY
AND NATIONAL SECURITY INSTALLATIONS.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(1) THE STATUS OF THE EFFORTS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, INCLUDING AN ASSESSMENT OF ANY OPPORTUNITIES TO
PARTICIPATE WITH OTHER STATES, FEDERAL AGENCIES, AND PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
PARTNERS IN A MULTISTATE PROCUREMENT OF NEW NUCLEAR ENERGY
TECHNOLOGY; AND
(2) AN EVALUATION AND STATUS OF THE NUCLEAR ENERGY
PROCUREMENT PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 12, PART II PART III OF
THIS TITLE.
7–216.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Energy storage device” means a resource capable of absorbing
electrical energy, storing it for a period of time, and delivering the energy for use at a later
time as needed, regardless of where the resource is located on the electric [distribution]
system.
(ii) “Energy storage device” includes all types of electric storage
technologies, regardless of their size, storage medium, or operational purpose, including:
1. thermal storage;
2. electrochemical storage;
3. [virtual power plants] THERMO–MECHANICAL
STORAGE; and
4. hydrogen–based storage.
(3) “Investor–owned electric company” means an electric company that is
not a municipal electric utility or an electric cooperative.
7–216.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–216 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 23 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) (1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE
STATE HAS A GOAL OF REACHING AT LEAST 150 MEGAWATTS OF
DISTRIBUTION–CONNECTED FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2025, AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026,
THE COMMISSION SHALL NOTIFY EACH INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY OF
ITS PROPORTION OF THE GOAL ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, BASED ON:
(I) THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE LOAD; OR
(II) OTHER CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2025, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REQUIRE EACH INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY TO SUBMIT A PLAN TO
ACHIEVE UP TO ONE–THIRD OF THE PROPORTION OF DISTRIBUTION–CONNECTED
FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES NECESSARY TO REACH THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S APPORTIONMENT OF THE GOAL STATED IN SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REQUIRE EACH INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY TO SUBMIT A PLAN FOR THE
BALANCE OF THE PROPORTION OF DISTRIBUTION–CONNECTED
FRONT–OF–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES NECESSARY TO REACH THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S APPORTIONMENT OF THE GOAL STATED IN SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION.
(3) ON OR BEFORE MAY 1, 2026, FOR PLANS SUBMITTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND ON OR BEFORE MAY
1, 2027, FOR PLANS SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) EVALUATE EACH PLAN;
(II) ACCEPT PUBLIC COMMENTS ON EACH PLAN; AND
(III) ISSUE AN ORDER FOR EACH PLAN THAT:
1. APPROVES THE PLAN;
2. APPROVES THE PLAN WITH MODIFICATIONS THAT
THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS NECESSARY; OR
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
3. REJECTS THE PLAN, WITH AN EXPLANATION OF THE
REASONS FOR THE REJECTION.
(4) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES CONSTRUCTED OR PROCURED
UNDER EACH PLAN SHALL INCLUDE A COMBINATION OF DEVICES OWNED BY THE
INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY AND DEVICES OWNED BY A THIRD PARTY,
WITH A GOAL OF 30% OF THE DEVICES BEING OWNED BY A THIRD PARTY.
(5) (I) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES THAT ARE CONSTRUCTED
OR PROCURED UNDER A PLAN SUBMITTED BY NOVEMBER 1, 2025, SHALL BE
OPERATIONAL BY NOVEMBER 1, 2027.
(II) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES THAT ARE CONSTRUCTED
OR PROCURED UNDER A PLAN SUBMITTED BY NOVEMBER 1, 2026, SHALL BE
OPERATIONAL BY NOVEMBER 1, 2028.
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND A DEADLINE UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE EACH PLAN TO DEMONSTRATE THAT
THE CONSTRUCTION OR PROCUREMENT OF EACH ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE:
(1) IS COST–EFFECTIVE IN CONSIDERATION OF A COST–BENEFIT
ANALYSIS, INCLUDING A DEMONSTRATION OF ANY:
(I) AVOIDED OR DELAYED TRANSMISSION, DISTRIBUTION, AND
GENERATION COSTS; AND
(II) AVOIDED EMISSIONS IN THE SHORT TERM AND PROJECTED
EMISSIONS IN THE LONG TERM, MEASURED USING THE SOCIAL COST OF CARBON, AS
DETERMINED BY THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY AS OF JANUARY
1, 2025;
(2) CAN BE COMPLETED WITHIN 18 MONTHS AFTER THE PLAN IS
APPROVED; AND
(3) COMPLIES WITH ANY OTHER FACTORS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION.
(E) (1) A DEVELOPER OF A THIRD–PARTY–OWNED ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICE CONSTRUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL ENSURE THAT
WORKERS ARE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED
UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE.
– 25 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE CONSTRUCTED AND OWNED BY AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL BE CONSTRUCTED BY:
(I) EMPLOYEES OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY; OR
(II) CONTRACTORS THAT SHALL ENSURE THAT WORKERS
CONSTRUCTING THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE ARE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE
PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (I) AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL
OPERATE AND MAINTAIN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES INSTALLED BY THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(II) IN PERFORMING THE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AN INVESTOR–OWNED
ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL MEET WITH THE EMPLOYEE BARGAINING UNIT’S LABOR
REPRESENTATIVE AND CONFER IN GOOD FAITH REGARDING THE VIABILITY OF:
1. ALLOCATING MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS WORK
TO CURRENT BARGAINING UNIT EMPLOYEES;
2. TRAINING CURRENT BARGAINING UNIT EMPLOYEES
TO PERFORM MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS WORK;
3. HIRING QUALIFIED INDIVIDUALS TO PERFORM
MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION WORK;
4. TRAINING NEWLY HIRED INDIVIDUALS TO PERFORM
MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS WORK; AND
5. MAINTAINING AND OPERATING STORAGE DEVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AN
INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY CONTRACT ANY WORK UNDER THIS
SECTION NOT CONDUCTED BY THE COMPANY’S EMPLOYEE BARGAINING UNIT TO A
QUALIFIED CONTRACTOR.
(II) AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL
REQUIRE A CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON A PROJECT UNDER THIS SECTION
TO:
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
1. PAY THE AREA PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED
BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY, INCLUDING WAGES AND FRINGE
BENEFITS; AND
2. OFFER HEALTH CARE AND RETIREMENT BENEFITS TO
THE EMPLOYEES WORKING ON THE PROJECT.
(F) (1) EACH ENERGY STORAGE PROJECT CONSTRUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE A PROPOSED DECOMMISSIONING
PLAN.
(2) THE PROPOSED DECOMMISSIONING PLAN SHALL INCLUDE A PLAN
TO MAXIMIZE THE RECYCLING OR REUSE OF ALL QUALIFYING COMPONENTS OF
EACH ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE.
(3) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE MAY
SUBMIT A REVISED RECYCLING AND REUSE PLAN THAT INCORPORATES EMERGING
RECYCLING AND REUSE OPPORTUNITIES UP TO 1 YEAR BEFORE EXECUTING THE
DECOMMISSIONING PLAN.
7–224.
(a) (1) Beginning January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2027, the Department shall procure or provide to low–income individuals energy
efficiency and conservation programs and services, demand response programs and
services, and beneficial electrification programs and services that achieve the greenhouse
gas emissions reduction targets established for the Department under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(2) For the period 2025–2033, the programs and services required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be on a trajectory to achieve greenhouse gas
reductions after 2027 of at least 0.9% of the baseline determined under subsection (b) of
this section.
(3) (i) When establishing greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
under this subsection, the Commission shall measure the greenhouse gas emissions from
electricity using current data and projections from the Department of the Environment.
(ii) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established
under this subsection shall be measured in metric tons.
(4) The greenhouse gas reductions achieved to meet the targets established
under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall count toward the achievement of the
greenhouse gas reduction target established under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle.
– 27 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) The target greenhouse gas savings shall be achieved based on the
3–year average of the Department’s plan submitted in accordance with subsection (d) of
this section.
(6) For 2025 and 2026:
(i) the Commission shall, after making appropriate findings,
determine whether the Department’s existing 2024–2026 plan must be modified to comply
with:
1. the targets established in this subsection; and
2. § 7–225(d) of this subtitle; and
(ii) the Department:
1. shall provide information as required by the Commission
to assist in making the determination in item (i) of this paragraph; and
2. is only required to file new plans in accordance with
subsection (d) of this section and § 7–225 of this subtitle if directed by the Commission.
(b) As a baseline for determining greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
under this section, the Commission shall use the greenhouse gas emissions resulting from
the direct consumption of gas and electricity by low–income residential households in 2016,
as determined by the Department of the Environment.
(c) [(1) The] WHEN CALCULATING THE ACHIEVEMENT OF GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION TARGETS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE Department may
procure or provide savings that are achieved through [funding sources that meet the
standards of program funding through utility rates or the U.S. Department of Energy] ALL
FUNDING SOURCES, TO THE EXTENT THAT THE SAVINGS FROM THOSE FUNDING
SOURCES ARE ACHIEVED:
(1) IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH REQUIREMENTS OF THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY; OR
(2) IN A MANNER OTHERWISE CONSISTENT WITH THE ENERGY
SAVINGS REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO THOSE FUNDING SOURCES.
[(2) The Department may use the savings achieved through all funding
sources toward calculating the targeted greenhouse gas reductions if the funding sources
meet the standards of programs funded through:
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(i) a surcharge under § 7–222 of this subtitle; or
(ii) the U.S. Department of Energy.]
7–506.1. 7–505.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including subsection (d) of
this section, AND SUBJECT TO § 4–213 OF THIS ARTICLE, the Commission may regulate
the regulated services of an electric company through alternative forms of regulation.
(2) The Commission may adopt an alternative form of regulation under this
section if the Commission finds, after notice and hearing, that the alternative form of
regulation:
(i) protects consumers;
(ii) ensures the quality, availability, and reliability of regulated
electric services; and
(iii) is in the interest of the public, including shareholders of the
electric company.
(3) Alternative forms of regulation may include:
(i) price regulation, including price freezes or caps;
(ii) revenue regulation;
(iii) ranges of authorized return;
(iv) rate of return;
(v) categories of services; or
(vi) price–indexing.
7–506.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS
TITLE.
– 29 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” MEANS A COMMERCIAL OR
INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER WITH AN EXPECTED LOAD DEMAND OF AT LEAST 100
MEGAWATTS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(I) AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER OR OTHER OWNER OF A
GENERATING STATION THAT ENTERS INTO A CONTRACT FOR THE PROVISION OF THE
DIRECT SUPPLY OF ELECTRICITY TO A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER IN A
WAY THAT BYPASSES:
1. INTERCONNECTION OF THE LOAD WITH THE ELECTRIC
TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS; OR
2. THE DISTRIBUTION SERVICES OF AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY; AND
(II) A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER THAT ENTERS
INTO A CONTRACT WITH AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER OR OTHER OWNER OF A
GENERATING STATION FOR THE PROVISION OF THE DIRECT SUPPLY OF ELECTRICITY
AS SPECIFIED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE USE OF ELECTRICITY
FROM AN ON–SITE GENERATING STATION THAT HAS BEEN APPROVED UNDER §
7–207.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BY FEDERAL LAW AND SUBSECTION (D)
SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (F) OF THIS SECTION AND UNTIL THE STATE CEASES TO BE A
NET IMPORTER OF ELECTRICITY, AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER OR OTHER OWNER OF
A GENERATING STATION MAY NOT ENTER INTO A CONTRACT FOR THE PROVISION OF
THE DIRECT SUPPLY OF ELECTRICITY TO A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL
CUSTOMER IN A WAY THAT BYPASSES:
(1) INTERCONNECTION WITH THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION AND
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS; OR
(2) THE DISTRIBUTION SERVICES OF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(D) AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER OR OTHER OWNER OF A GENERATING
STATION MAY ENTER INTO A CONTRACT FOR THE PROVISION OF THE DIRECT SUPPLY
OF ELECTRICITY TO A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IN A WAY THAT BYPASSES
INTERCONNECTION DIRECT INTERCONNECTION OF THE LOAD WITH THE ELECTRIC
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS OR THE DISTRIBUTION SERVICES OF
AN ELECTRIC COMPANY IF THE GENERATING STATION:
(1) (I) INCREMENTALLY INCREASES ITS GENERATION OUTPUT
FROM EXISTING LEVELS TO A LEVEL THAT MEETS 100% OF THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER’S EXPECTED LOAD DEMAND; OR
(II) CREATES NEW GENERATION OUTPUT AT A LEVEL THAT
MEETS 100% OF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S EXPECTED LOAD DEMAND; AND
(2) OBTAINS, IF NECESSARY:
(I) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE GENERATING STATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
7–207 OF THIS TITLE AND ANY OTHER ASSOCIATED STANDARD; AND
(II) ANY OTHER STANDARD SITING APPROVALS AND PERMITS
RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF A GENERATING STATION.
(E) THE COMMISSION MAY APPLY TO A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER AND ANY
GENERATING STATION SUPPLYING ELECTRICITY TO THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION ANY DIRECT OR INDIRECT COSTS AND FEES THAT
ARE NORMALLY APPLIED TO THE RETAIL ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS IN THE SERVICE
TERRITORY IN WHICH THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER OR GENERATING STATION IS
LOCATED IF THE DIRECT OR INDIRECT COSTS AND FEES ARE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER AND ANY GENERATING STATION SUPPLYING ELECTRICITY
TO THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT
COMMERCIAL AND INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMERS FROM FORMING A MICROGRID THAT:
(1) RELIES SOLELY ON NEW GENERATION OUTPUT; AND
(2) DOES NOT INTERCONNECT WITH:
(I) THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS;
(II) ANY LOAD CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION
OR DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS; OR
(III) ANY OTHER GENERATING STATION.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY APPLY TO A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL
CUSTOMER AND ANY GENERATING STATION SUPPLYING ELECTRICITY TO THE
– 31 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) ANY DIRECT OR INDIRECT COSTS, FEES, AND OBLIGATIONS THAT
ARE NORMALLY APPLIED TO RETAIL ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS IN THE SERVICE
TERRITORY IN WHICH THE COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER OR
GENERATING STATION IS LOCATED OR INTERCONNECTED IF THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES THAT THE DIRECT OR INDIRECT COSTS, FEES, AND OBLIGATIONS
SHOULD BE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER AND
ANY GENERATING STATION SUPPLYING ELECTRICITY TO THE COMMERCIAL OR
INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER; AND
(2) ANY AVOIDED WHOLESALE COSTS THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES HAVE BEEN OR MAY BE SHIFTED INAPPROPRIATELY TO OTHER RETAIL
ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS AS A RESULT OF THE PROVISION OF THE DIRECT SUPPLY OF
ELECTRICITY AS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) TRANSMISSION COSTS;
(II) ENERGY COSTS;
(III) CAPACITY COSTS; AND
(IV) ANCILLARY SERVICES COSTS.
SUBTITLE 12. ENERGY SOLICITATION AND PROCUREMENT.
PART I. EMERGENCY ENERGY PROCUREMENT DEFINITIONS; GENERAL
PROVISIONS.
7–1201.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION” MEANS A GENERATING
STATION OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE WITH:
(1) AN EFFECTIVE LOAD CARRYING CAPABILITY OF AT LEAST 65%, AS
DETERMINED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION’S MOST RECENT ELCC CLASS RATINGS;
AND
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(2) A LOWER GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS PROFILE THAN COAL OR
OIL ENERGY GENERATING STATIONS.
(C) “EFFECTIVE LOAD CARRYING CAPABILITY” OR “ELCC” MEANS THE
EXPECTED CAPACITY CONTRIBUTION OF AN ENERGY RESOURCE DURING PJM
INTERCONNECTION’S OPERATING HOURS WHEN THERE IS HIGH ELECTRICITY
DEMAND AND LOW RESOURCE OUTPUT.
(D) “EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF ENERGY
AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE CAN DELIVER CONTINUOUSLY TO THE ELECTRIC
SYSTEM OVER A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 4 HOURS.
(D) (E) “ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–216 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) (F) “GENERATING STATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF
THIS TITLE.
(G) “LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE” MEANS A GENERATING STATION
OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE THAT:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025:
(I) HAS APPLIED TO PJM FOR INTERCONNECTION APPROVAL;
OR
(II) HAS BEEN APPROVED BY PJM FOR INTERCONNECTION;
AND
(2) HAS A CAPACITY RATING EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN 20
MEGAWATTS AFTER ACCOUNTING FOR THE EFFECTIVE LOAD CARRYING
CAPABILITY.
7–1202.
(A) AN APPLICATION FOR A PROPOSED PROJECT UNDER PARTS III AND IV
OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT.
(B) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT SHALL:
(1) PROMOTE INCREASED OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL BUSINESSES
AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESSES IN THE
CLEAN ENERGY INDUSTRY;
– 33 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) ENSURE THE TIMELY, SAFE, AND EFFICIENT COMPLETION OF THE
PROJECT BY:
(I) FACILITATING A STEADY SUPPLY OF HIGHLY SKILLED
CRAFT WORKERS WHO SHALL BE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) GUARANTEEING THAT THE CONSTRUCTION WORK
PERFORMED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROJECT WILL BE SUBJECT TO AN
AGREEMENT THAT:
1. ESTABLISHES THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT AT THE CONSTRUCTION SITE OF THE PROJECT OR A PORTION OF THE
PROJECT;
2. GUARANTEES AGAINST STRIKES, LOCKOUTS, AND
SIMILAR DISRUPTIONS;
3. ENSURES THAT ALL WORK ON THE PROJECT FULLY
CONFORMS TO ALL RELEVANT STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS, RULES, AND
REGULATIONS, INCLUDING ALL REQUIRED TRAINING FOR EMPLOYEES;
4. CREATES MUTUALLY BINDING PROCEDURES FOR
RESOLVING LABOR DISPUTES ARISING DURING THE TERM OF THE DISPATCHABLE
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT;
5. SETS FORTH OTHER MECHANISMS FOR
LABOR–MANAGEMENT COOPERATION ON MATTERS OF MUTUAL INTEREST AND
CONCERN, INCLUDING PRODUCTIVITY, QUALITY OF WORK, SAFETY, AND HEALTH;
AND
6. BINDS ALL CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO
THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT THROUGH THE INCLUSION OF APPROPRIATE
PROVISIONS IN ALL RELEVANT SOLICITATION AND CONTRACT DOCUMENTS;
(3) PROMOTE SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT BY ENSURING
THAT AT LEAST 80% OF THE CRAFT WORKERS ON THE PROJECT HAVE COMPLETED
A 10–HOUR OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH ADMINISTRATION COURSE;
(4) PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES IN THE
MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, MINORITIES, AND FORMERLY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS;
(5) INCLUDE PROVISIONS FOR LOCAL HIRING AND THE HIRING OF
HISTORICALLY DISADVANTAGED GROUPS;
(6) USE LOCALLY, SUSTAINABLY, AND DOMESTICALLY
MANUFACTURED CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS AND COMPONENTS TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE;
(7) REQUIRE THE USE OF SKILLED LOCAL LABOR, PARTICULARLY
WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE
PROJECT, USING METHODS INCLUDING OUTREACH, HIRING, AND REFERRAL
METHODS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE; AND
(8) AUTHORIZE THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND THE
COMMISSION TO CONSIDER, REVIEW, AND ENFORCE A STORAGE DEVELOPER OR
ENERGY DEVELOPER’S COMPLIANCE WITH ANY COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT.
7–1203.
THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT
CONSULTANTS AND EXPERTS TO IMPLEMENT AND EXECUTE ANY PART OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
7–1204. RESERVED.
7–1205. RESERVED.
PART II. DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION AND LARGE CAPACITY
RESOURCES.
7–1206.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND AT OTHER TIMES AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE
ONE OR MORE COMPETITIVE SOLICITATIONS FOR PROPOSALS FOR CONSTRUCTING
OR EXPANDING DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION IN THE STATE THE
CONSTRUCTION OR EXPANSION OF:
(I) DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION; AND
(II) LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCES.
– 35 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL SET THE CLOSING DATE FOR THE
SOLICITATION PERIOD TO BE NOT SOONER THAN 120 30 DAYS AFTER ISSUING THE
REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS IS ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY PROVIDE FOR AN ADDITIONAL SOLICITATION
PERIOD IF THE CAPACITY SPECIFIED UNDER § 7–1203(B)(1) § 7–1208(D)(1) OF THIS
SUBTITLE HAS NOT BEEN MET DURING THE INITIAL SOLICITATION PERIOD.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE TO THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM A COPY OF EACH PROPOSAL RECEIVED IN RESPONSE TO THE
SOLICITATION.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE OR DEVELOP A FINANCIAL COMMITMENT FOR
THE COSTS RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OR OPERATION OF A DISPATCHABLE
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT OR LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE PROJECT
APPROVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PART MAY NOT BE RECOVERED THROUGH
UTILITY RATES.
(2) A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT OR LARGE
CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE PROJECT APPROVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
PART MAY PARTICIPATE IN OTHER PROCESSES UNDER WHICH RATEPAYER FUNDS
ARE AWARDED TO DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION OR LARGE CAPACITY
ENERGY RESOURCES.
7–1203.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, UNLESS EXTENDED BY
MUTUAL CONSENT OF THE PARTIES, THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE,
CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY A PROPOSAL SUBMITTED IN RESPONSE TO A
SOLICITATION ISSUED UNDER § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER
THE CLOSE OF THE SOLICITATION PERIOD.
7–1207.
THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE SPECIFICATIONS IN A SOLICITATION
ISSUED UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT REQUIRE EACH PROPOSAL FOR A
DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY
RESOURCE PROJECT TO:
(1) IF THE PROJECT IS A NATURAL GAS ENERGY GENERATING
STATION, ENSURE THAT THE PROJECT CAN BE CONVERTED TO USE ONLY HYDROGEN
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
OR A ZERO–EMISSIONS BIOFUEL AS THE ENERGY SOURCE WHEN THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES THAT THE CONVERSION IS FEASIBLE;
(2) INCLUDE A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE TIMELINE FOR
CONSTRUCTION OF THE PROJECT, INCLUDING:
(I) IDENTIFYING THE ENTITY THAT HAS OWNERSHIP OR SITE
CONTROL OF THE PROJECT SITE;
(II) QUEUE POSITION FOR PJM APPROVAL;
(III) THE ABILITY TO PROCURE MATERIALS, INCLUDING
TURBINES AND OTHER PIPELINE MATERIALS; AND
(IV) ANY INFORMATION THAT DEMONSTRATES THE
APPLICANT’S:
1. READINESS TO APPLY FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OR § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE AS SOON
AS IS REASONABLY FEASIBLE AFTER RECEIVING APPROVAL FOR THE PROJECT,
INCLUDING THE ANTICIPATED APPLICATION DATE; AND
2. ABILITY TO DEVELOP THE PROJECT WITHIN THE
TIMELINE PRESENTED;
(3) INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF THE LOCATION OF THE PROJECT
SITE, INCLUDING:
(I) THE PROXIMITY OF THE SITE TO EXISTING TRANSMISSION
LINES AND RIGHTS–OF–WAY; AND
(II) WHETHER THE PROJECT WOULD BE RETROFITTING A
CURRENT OR PREVIOUS GENERATING STATION SITE;
(4) IF APPLICABLE, INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF:
(I) THE TYPE AND AMOUNT OF CO–LOCATED ENERGY
GENERATION FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–701 OF THIS
TITLE, THAT WOULD BE USED WITH THE PROJECT;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF CO–LOCATED ENERGY STORAGE THAT
WOULD BE USED WITH THE PROJECT;
– 37 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) THE USE OF CARBON CAPTURE OR SEQUESTRATION
TECHNOLOGY TO MITIGATE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM THE PROJECT; AND
(IV) THE AMOUNT OF HYDROGEN OR ZERO–EMISSIONS
BIOFUELS THAT THE PROJECT WILL MIX WITH NATURAL GAS FOR ENERGY
GENERATION; AND
(5) STATE THE EMISSIONS INTENSITY OF THE GENERATION OUTPUT
OVER THE LIFE OF THE PROJECT.
7–1208.
(A) (1) WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE CLOSING DATE FOR THE
SOLICITATION PERIOD SET IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR
SOONER AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION, THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM SHALL RECOMMEND TO THE COMMISSION PROPOSALS TO BE
AUTHORIZED TO UTILIZE THE EXPEDITED CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY PROCESS UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM SHALL BASE ITS
RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE INFORMATION IN THE PROPOSALS RECEIVED AND THE
SPECIFICATIONS LISTED IN §§ 7–1207 AND 7–1209 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION AND AFTER
CONSIDERING THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE
COMMISSION GRANTS A REQUEST FOR AN EXTENSION FOR GOOD CAUSE, NOT LATER
THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE SOLICITATION PERIOD THE COMMISSION
SHALL APPROVE, CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY A PROPOSAL SUBMITTED IN
RESPONSE TO A SOLICITATION ISSUED UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) IN ADDITION TO THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN § 7–1207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE WHICH PROPOSALS TO APPROVE
BASED ON THE FACTORS AND REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN § 7–1209 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) (D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMBINED TOTAL CAPACITY OF DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS
AND LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE PROJECTS APPROVED UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE GREATER THAN THE COMBINED SUMMER PEAK CAPACITY
PROFILE OF COAL AND OIL ENERGY GENERATING STATIONS IN THE STATE AS
OUTLINED UNDER TABLE 9 OF THE COMMISSION’S TEN–YEAR PLAN (2024–2033)
OF ELECTRIC COMPANIES IN MARYLAND.
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(2) THE COMBINED TOTAL CAPACITY OF NATURAL GAS
DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS AND LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY
RESOURCE PROJECTS APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED THE
COMBINED SUMMER PEAK CAPACITY PROFILE OF COAL AND OIL ENERGY
GENERATING STATIONS IN THE STATE AS OUTLINED UNDER TABLE 9 OF THE
COMMISSION’S TEN–YEAR PLAN (2024–2033) OF ELECTRIC COMPANIES IN
MARYLAND.
(C) ON AND BEFORE JUNE 30, 2030, A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE
EXPEDITED CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY PROCESS
UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) EVERY 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT A NATURAL GAS DISPATCHABLE
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT OR LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE PROJECT
BECOMES OPERATIONAL UNDER A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY ISSUED UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF
THE NATURAL GAS DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION OR LARGE CAPACITY
ENERGY RESOURCE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A REPORT REGARDING THE
FEASIBILITY OF CONVERTING THE NATURAL GAS DISPATCHABLE ENERGY
GENERATION OR LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE TO THE USE OF ONLY
HYDROGEN OR ZERO–EMISSIONS BIOFUEL.
(F) AN APPROVAL OR CONDITIONAL APPROVAL OF A PROJECT UNDER THIS
SECTION DOES NOT GUARANTEE THAT THE PROJECT WILL BE ISSUED A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OR §
7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE.
7–1204.
THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE SPECIFICATIONS IN A SOLICITATION
ISSUED UNDER § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT REQUIRE EACH PROPOSAL FOR A
DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT TO:
(1) FOR A NATURAL GAS ENERGY GENERATING STATION, ENSURE
THAT THE PROJECT CAN BE CONVERTED TO USE ONLY HYDROGEN OR A
ZERO–EMISSIONS BIOFUEL AS THE ENERGY SOURCE WHEN THE CONVERSION IS
FEASIBLE, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
(2) INCLUDE A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS THAT SHALL INCLUDE, AT A
MINIMUM:
– 39 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) A DETAILED INPUT–OUTPUT ANALYSIS OF THE IMPACT OF
THE PROJECT ON INCOME, EMPLOYMENT, WAGES, AND TAXES IN THE STATE;
(II) DETAILED INFORMATION CONCERNING ASSUMED
EMPLOYMENT IMPACTS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE EXPECTED DURATION OF
EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES, THE SALARY OF EACH POSITION, AND OTHER
SUPPORTING EVIDENCE OF EMPLOYMENT IMPACTS;
(III) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY IMPACT ON RESIDENTIAL,
COMMERCIAL, AND INDUSTRIAL RATEPAYERS OVER THE LIFE OF THE PROJECT;
(IV) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY LONG–TERM EFFECT ON ENERGY AND
CAPACITY MARKETS AS A RESULT OF THE PROJECT;
(V) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY IMPACT THE PROJECT WOULD HAVE
ON BUSINESSES IN THE STATE;
(VI) AN ANALYSIS OF THE ANTICIPATED ENVIRONMENTAL
BENEFITS, HEALTH BENEFITS, AND ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS OF THE PROJECT TO
THE CITIZENS OF THE STATE; AND
(VII) AN ANALYSIS OF OTHER BENEFITS RESULTING FROM THE
PROJECT, INCLUDING INCREASED IN–STATE CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION AND
MAINTENANCE NEEDS, AND EQUIPMENT PURCHASES;
(3) INCLUDE A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE TIMELINE FOR
CONSTRUCTION OF THE PROJECT, INCLUDING:
(I) IDENTIFYING THE ENTITY THAT HAS OWNERSHIP OR SITE
CONTROL OF THE PROJECT SITE;
(II) QUEUE POSITION FOR PJM INTERCONNECTION APPROVAL;
AND
(III) THE ABILITY TO PROCURE MATERIALS, INCLUDING
TURBINES AND OTHER PIPELINE MATERIALS;
(4) INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF THE LOCATION OF THE PROJECT
SITE, INCLUDING:
(I) THE PROXIMITY OF THE SITE TO EXISTING TRANSMISSION
LINES AND RIGHTS–OF–WAY; AND
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(II) WHETHER THE PROJECT WOULD BE RETROFITTING A
CURRENT OR PREVIOUS GENERATING STATION SITE; AND
(5) IF APPLICABLE, INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF:
(I) THE TYPE AND AMOUNT OF CO–LOCATED ENERGY
GENERATION FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–701 OF THIS
TITLE, THAT WOULD BE USED WITH THE PROJECT;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF CO–LOCATED ENERGY STORAGE THAT
WOULD BE USED WITH THE PROJECT;
(III) THE USE OF CARBON CAPTURE OR SEQUESTRATION
TECHNOLOGY TO MITIGATE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM THE PROJECT; AND
(IV) THE AMOUNT OF HYDROGEN OR ZERO–EMISSIONS
BIOFUELS THAT THE PROJECT WILL MIX WITH NATURAL GAS FOR ENERGY
GENERATION.
7–1205.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL USE THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA TO EVALUATE
AND COMPARE PROPOSALS FOR DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS
SUBMITTED DURING A SOLICITATION PERIOD UNDER § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) THE LOWEST COST IMPACT ON RATEPAYERS;
(2) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS SUBMITTED
UNDER § 7–1204 OF THIS SUBTITLE DEMONSTRATES POSITIVE NET ECONOMIC,
ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HEALTH BENEFITS TO THE STATE;
(3) THE TIMELINE FOR CONSTRUCTION OF THE PROJECT,
INCLUDING:
(I) IDENTIFYING THE ENTITY THAT HAS OWNERSHIP OR SITE
CONTROL OF THE PROJECT SITE;
(II) POSITION IN THE PJM INTERCONNECTION QUEUE; AND
(III) ABILITY TO PROCURE MATERIALS, INCLUDING TURBINES
AND OTHER PIPELINE MATERIALS;
(4) THE LOCATION OF THE PROJECT SITE, INCLUDING THE
PROXIMITY OF THE SITE TO EXISTING TRANSMISSION LINES AND RIGHTS–OF–WAY;
– 41 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) WHETHER THE PROJECT WOULD BE RETROFITTING A CURRENT
OR PAST GENERATING STATION SITE; AND
(6) IF APPLICABLE:
(I) THE TYPE AND AMOUNT OF CO–LOCATED ENERGY
GENERATION FROM TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–701 OF THIS
TITLE, THAT WOULD BE USED WITH THE PROJECT;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF CO–LOCATED ENERGY STORAGE THAT
WOULD BE USED WITH THE PROJECT;
(III) THE USE OF CARBON CAPTURE OR SEQUESTRATION
TECHNOLOGY TO MITIGATE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM THE PROJECT; AND
(IV) THE AMOUNT OF HYDROGEN OR ZERO–EMISSIONS
BIOFUELS THAT THE PROJECT WILL MIX WITH NATURAL GAS FOR ENERGY
GENERATION.
(B) IN EVALUATING AND COMPARING A PROPOSAL FOR A DISPATCHABLE
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS
AND EXPERTS.
7–1206. RESERVED.
7–1207. RESERVED.
7–1209.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY
APPROVE UP TO 10 PROPOSALS TO BE ELIGIBLE TO UNDERGO THE EXPEDITED
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY PROCESS UNDER § 7–207.4
OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE MORE THAN 10 PROPOSALS TO
BE ELIGIBLE TO UNDERGO THE EXPEDITED CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY PROCESS UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE ONLY IF THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT:
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(I) THE COMMISSION HAS SUFFICIENT RESOURCES TO
COMPLETE THAT NUMBER OF EXPEDITED REVIEWS OF APPLICATIONS FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(II) THE NUMBER OF EXPEDITED REVIEWS OF APPLICATIONS
FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207.4 OF
THIS TITLE IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST.
(3) IF NOT MORE THAN 10 PROJECTS RESPOND TO A SOLICITATION
ISSUED UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE,
SUBJECT TO § 7–1208(D)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE, ALL PROJECTS THAT APPLY FOR THE
SOLICITATION.
(B) (1) FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBSECTION, A TRANSMISSION
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE SHALL BE CONSIDERED A NON–EMISSIONS EMITTING
NON–EMISSIONS–EMITTING PROJECT.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE 4 NON–EMISSIONS EMITTING
NON–EMISSIONS–EMITTING PROJECTS TO EVERY 1 EMISSIONS–EMITTING PROJECT.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE THE REQUIREMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF A SUFFICIENT NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS
FOR PROJECTS THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENT ARE NOT RECEIVED.
(C) (1) IN DETERMINING WHICH PROPOSALS TO APPROVE, THE
COMMISSION SHALL PRIORITIZE DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS
OVER LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCES.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE PRIORITIZATION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IF THE COMMISSION RECEIVES MORE THAN 10 PROPOSALS OR
DETERMINES THAT MORE THAN 10 PROPOSALS MAY BE APPROVED UNDER § 7–1208
OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL BASE THE APPROVALS ON:
(I) WHICH PROJECTS WILL PROVIDE THE HIGHEST CAPACITY
VALUE TO THE STATE;
(II) WHICH PROJECTS ARE READY THE TIMELINESS OF A
PROJECT TO BEGIN CONSTRUCTION;
(III) THE TIMELINESS OF A PROJECT TO BEGIN OPERATION; AND
– 43 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) WHICH PROJECTS HAVE THE LOWEST EMISSIONS
INTENSITY.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE WHEN THE PROCEEDINGS FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS
TITLE WILL BEGIN FOR A PROPOSAL APPROVED UNDER THIS PART.
(E) THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS AND EXPERTS IN EVALUATING AND COMPARING
WHETHER A PROPOSAL SHALL BE APPROVED TO BE ELIGIBLE TO UNDERGO AN
EXPEDITED CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY PROCESS
UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE.
(F) A PROPOSAL THAT IS NOT APPROVED TO BE ELIGIBLE TO UNDERGO AN
EXPEDITED CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY PROCESS
UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS TITLE MAY APPLY FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS TITLE.
7–1210. RESERVED.
7–1211. RESERVED.
PART II. PART III. NUCLEAR ENERGY PROCUREMENT.
7–1208. 7–1212.
(A) (1) AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF COMMISSION REGULATIONS
IMPLEMENTING THIS PART, A PERSON MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT, INCLUDING AN APPLICATION TO UPGRADE THE GENERATION
CAPABILITIES OF AN EXISTING NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION.
(2) FOR AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE SHALL
BE BASED ONLY ON ANY NEW GENERATION PROPOSED IN THE APPLICATION,
INCLUDING NEW GENERATION AT AN EXISTING NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATION.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(I) OPEN AN APPLICATION PERIOD DURING WHICH OTHER
INTERESTED PERSONS MAY SUBMIT APPLICATIONS FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT; AND
(II) PROVIDE NOTICE THAT THE COMMISSION IS ACCEPTING
APPLICATIONS FOR APPROVAL OF PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECTS.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL SET THE CLOSING DATE FOR THE
APPLICATION PERIOD TO BE NOT SOONER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE
PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST TWO ADDITIONAL
APPLICATION PERIODS BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2031.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY PROVIDE ADDITIONAL APPLICATION PERIODS
THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
7–1209. 7–1213.
(A) UNLESS EXTENDED BY MUTUAL CONSENT OF THE PARTIES SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE,
CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER § 7–1208
§ 7–1212 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE APPLICATION
PERIOD.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE TIME TO APPROVE,
CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY AN APPLICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION FOR GOOD CAUSE.
7–1210. 7–1214.
AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT UNDER § 7–1208 § 7–1212 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION AND FINANCIAL ANALYSIS OF THE
PROJECT;
(2) THE PROPOSED METHOD OF FINANCING THE PROJECT,
INCLUDING DOCUMENTATION DEMONSTRATING THAT THE APPLICANT HAS APPLIED
FOR ALL CURRENT ELIGIBLE STATE AND FEDERAL GRANTS, REBATES, TAX CREDITS,
LOAN GUARANTEES, AND OTHER PROGRAMS AVAILABLE TO OFFSET THE COST OF
THE PROJECT OR PROVIDE TAX ADVANTAGES;
– 45 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A COMMITMENT THAT THE APPLICANT WILL USE BEST EFFORTS
TO APPLY FOR ALL ELIGIBLE STATE AND FEDERAL GRANTS, REBATES, TAX CREDITS,
LOAN GUARANTEES, OR OTHER SIMILAR BENEFITS AS THOSE BENEFITS BECOME
AVAILABLE;
(4) A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS THAT SHALL INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) A DETAILED INPUT–OUTPUT ANALYSIS OF THE IMPACT OF
THE PROJECT ON INCOME, EMPLOYMENT, WAGES, AND TAXES IN THE STATE;
(II) DETAILED INFORMATION CONCERNING ASSUMED
EMPLOYMENT IMPACTS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE EXPECTED DURATION OF
EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES, THE SALARY OF EACH POSITION, AND OTHER
SUPPORTING EVIDENCE OF EMPLOYMENT IMPACTS;
(III) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY IMPACT ON RESIDENTIAL,
COMMERCIAL, AND INDUSTRIAL RATEPAYERS OVER THE LIFE OF THE PROJECT;
(IV) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY LONG–TERM EFFECT ON ENERGY AND
CAPACITY MARKETS AS A RESULT OF THE PROJECT;
(V) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY IMPACT THE PROJECT WOULD HAVE
ON BUSINESSES IN THE STATE;
(VI) AN ANALYSIS OF THE ANTICIPATED ENVIRONMENTAL
BENEFITS, HEALTH BENEFITS, AND ENVIRONMENTAL ECONOMIC IMPACTS OF THE
PROJECT TO THE CITIZENS OF THE STATE; AND
(VII) AN ANALYSIS OF OTHER BENEFITS RESULTING FROM THE
PROJECT, INCLUDING INCREASED IN–STATE CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION AND
MAINTENANCE NEEDS, AND EQUIPMENT PURCHASES;
(5) A PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE FOR THE PROJECT
THAT SHALL SPECIFY A PRICE FOR THE GENERATION ATTRIBUTES, INCLUDING THE
ENERGY, CAPACITY, ANCILLARY SERVICES, AND ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES;
(6) A DECOMMISSIONING AND WASTE STORAGE PLAN FOR THE
PROJECT, INCLUDING PROVISIONS FOR DECOMMISSIONING OR WASTE STORAGE AS
REQUIRED BY THE U.S. NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION;
(7) A COMMITMENT TO ABIDE BY THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN
§ 7–1213 § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(8) A DESCRIPTION OF THE APPLICANT’S PLAN FOR ENGAGING SMALL
BUSINESSES, AS DEFINED IN § 14–501 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE;
(9) IF APPLICABLE, THE STATEMENT SPECIFIED IN § 7–1211(C)(2) §
7–1215(B)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(10) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION REQUIRES.
7–1211. 7–1215.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL USE THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA TO EVALUATE
AND COMPARE APPLICATIONS FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS
SUBMITTED DURING AN APPLICATION PERIOD UNDER § 7–1208 § 7–1212 OF THIS
SUBTITLE:
(1) THE LOWEST COST IMPACT ON RATEPAYERS OF THE PRICE SET
UNDER A PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE;
(2) POTENTIAL REDUCTIONS IN TRANSMISSION CONGESTION PRICES
WITHIN THE STATE;
(3) POTENTIAL CHANGES IN CAPACITY PRICES WITHIN THE STATE;
(4) POTENTIAL REDUCTIONS IN LOCATIONAL MARGINAL PRICING;
(5) POTENTIAL LONG–TERM CHANGES IN CAPACITY PRICES WITHIN
THE STATE FROM THE PROJECT AS IT COMPARES TO CONVENTIONAL ENERGY
SOURCES;
(6) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS SUBMITTED
UNDER § 7–1210 § 7–1214 OF THIS SUBTITLE DEMONSTRATES POSITIVE NET
ECONOMIC, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HEALTH BENEFITS TO THE STATE;
(7) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN FOR ENGAGING
SMALL BUSINESSES MEETS THE GOALS SPECIFIED IN TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(8) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR THE
USE OF SKILLED LABOR, PARTICULARLY WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND
MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE PROJECT, THROUGH OUTREACH, HIRING,
OR REFERRAL SYSTEMS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAMS UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT
ARTICLE;
– 47 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(9) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR THE
USE OF AN AGREEMENT DESIGNED TO ENSURE THE USE OF SKILLED LABOR AND TO
PROMOTE THE PROMPT, EFFICIENT, AND SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT,
PARTICULARLY WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION, MANUFACTURING, AND
MAINTENANCE OF THE PROJECT;
(10) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR
COMPENSATION TO ITS EMPLOYEES AND SUBCONTRACTORS CONSISTENT WITH
WAGES OUTLINED UNDER TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(11) SITING AND PROJECT FEASIBILITY;
(12) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE PROJECT WOULD REQUIRE
TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS IN THE
STATE; AND
(13) ANY OTHER CRITERIA THAT THE COMMISSION DETERMINES ARE
APPROPRIATE.
(B) IN EVALUATING AND COMPARING AN APPLICATION FOR A NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS
AND EXPERTS.
(C) (1) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “MINORITY” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
A MEMBER OF ANY OF THE GROUPS LISTED IN § 14–301(K)(1)(I) OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) IF AN APPLICANT IS SEEKING INVESTORS IN A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT, THE APPLICANT SHALL TAKE THE
FOLLOWING STEPS BEFORE THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE THE PROPOSED
PROJECT:
(I) MAKE SERIOUS, GOOD–FAITH EFFORTS TO SOLICIT AND
INTERVIEW A REASONABLE NUMBER OF MINORITY INVESTORS;
(II) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION, SUBMIT A STATEMENT TO
THE COMMISSION THAT LISTS THE NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF ALL MINORITY
INVESTORS INTERVIEWED AND WHETHER OR NOT ANY OF THOSE INVESTORS HAVE
PURCHASED AN EQUITY SHARE IN THE ENTITY SUBMITTING THE APPLICATION;
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(III) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION THAT REQUIRES THE APPLICANT TO AGAIN MAKE SERIOUS,
GOOD–FAITH EFFORTS TO SOLICIT AND INTERVIEW A REASONABLE NUMBER OF
MINORITY INVESTORS IN ANY FUTURE ATTEMPTS TO RAISE VENTURE CAPITAL OR
ATTRACT NEW INVESTORS TO THE PROJECT;
(IV) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION THAT REQUIRES THE APPLICANT TO USE BEST EFFORTS AND
EFFECTIVE OUTREACH TO OBTAIN, AS A GOAL, CONTRACTORS AND
SUBCONTRACTORS FOR THE PROJECT THAT ARE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, AS SUPPORTED BY A DISPARITY
STUDY; AND
(V) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION AND SKILLED LABOR ORGANIZATIONS THAT REQUIRES THE
APPLICANT TO FOLLOW THE PORTIONS OF THE APPLICANT’S PLAN THAT RELATE TO
THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (A)(8) AND (9) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, SHALL PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO ALL POTENTIAL APPLICANTS AND
POTENTIAL MINORITY INVESTORS TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(I) AND (III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–1212. 7–1216.
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE AN APPLICATION FOR A NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT SUBMITTED UNDER § 7–1208 § 7–1212 OF THIS
SUBTITLE UNLESS:
(1) THE PROJECT IS CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE;
(2) OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE, THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT FOR AN AVERAGE RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMER, BASED ON ANNUAL CONSUMPTION OF 12,000 KILOWATT–HOURS AND
COMBINED WITH THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT OF OTHER NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECTS, DOES NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION;
(3) OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE, THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT FOR ALL NONRESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMERS, CONSIDERED AS A BLENDED AVERAGE AND COMBINED WITH THE
– 49 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT OF OTHER NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECTS, DOES NOT EXCEED A PERCENTAGE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION
OF NONRESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS’ TOTAL ANNUAL ELECTRIC BILLS; AND
(4) THE PRICE SPECIFIED IN THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE DOES NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) WHEN CALCULATING THE PROJECTED NET AVERAGE RATE IMPACTS
FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL APPLY THE SAME NET LONG–TERM COST PER
MEGAWATT–HOUR TO RESIDENTIAL AND NONRESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP CONFIDENTIAL ANY AMOUNTS
DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
7–1213.
(A) AN APPLICATION FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
SUBMITTED UNDER § 7–1208 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY
BENEFIT AGREEMENT.
(B) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT SHALL:
(1) BE APPLICABLE TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT;
(2) PROMOTE INCREASED OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL BUSINESSES
AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESSES IN THE
RENEWABLE ENERGY INDUSTRY;
(3) ENSURE THE TIMELY, SAFE, AND EFFICIENT COMPLETION OF THE
PROJECT BY:
(I) FACILITATING A STEADY SUPPLY OF HIGHLY SKILLED
CRAFT WORKERS WHO SHALL BE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) GUARANTEEING THAT THE CONSTRUCTION WORK
PERFORMED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROJECT WILL BE SUBJECT TO AN
AGREEMENT THAT:
1. IS WITH ONE OR MORE LABOR ORGANIZATIONS; AND
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
2. ESTABLISHES, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION,
THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT AT THE CONSTRUCTION SITE OF THE
PROJECT OR A PORTION OF THE PROJECT;
(4) PROMOTE SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT BY ENSURING
THAT AT LEAST 80% OF THE CRAFT WORKERS ON THE PROJECT HAVE COMPLETED
AN OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH ADMINISTRATION 10–HOUR OR 30–HOUR
COURSE;
(5) PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES IN THE
MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL
RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, AND MINORITIES;
(6) PROVIDE FOR BEST EFFORTS AND EFFECTIVE OUTREACH TO
OBTAIN, AS A GOAL, THE USE OF A WORKFORCE INCLUDING MINORITIES, TO THE
EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(7) REFLECT A 21ST–CENTURY LABOR–MANAGEMENT APPROACH BY
DEVELOPERS AND SUPPLIERS BASED ON COOPERATION, HARMONY, AND
PARTNERSHIP THAT PROACTIVELY SEEKS TO ENSURE THAT WORKERS CAN FREELY
CHOOSE TO BOTH ORGANIZE AND COLLECTIVELY BARGAIN;
(8) PROVIDE PLANS TO USE DOMESTIC IRON, STEEL, AND
MANUFACTURED GOODS TO THE GREATEST EXTENT PRACTICABLE BY DISCLOSING
CONTRACTED SUPPLIERS;
(9) USE LOCALLY AND DOMESTICALLY MANUFACTURED
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS AND COMPONENTS;
(10) MAXIMIZE THE USE OF SKILLED LOCAL LABOR, PARTICULARLY
WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE
PROJECT, USING METHODS INCLUDING OUTREACH, HIRING, OR REFERRAL
METHODS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE;
(11) GUARANTEE AGAINST STRIKES, LOCKOUTS, AND SIMILAR
DISRUPTIONS;
(12) ENSURE THAT ALL WORK ON THE PROJECT FULLY CONFORMS TO
ALL RELEVANT STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS;
(13) CREATE MUTUALLY BINDING PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING
LABOR DISPUTES ARISING DURING THE TERM OF THE PROJECT;
– 51 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(14) SET FORTH OTHER MECHANISMS FOR LABOR–MANAGEMENT
COOPERATION ON MATTERS OF MUTUAL INTEREST AND CONCERN, INCLUDING
PRODUCTIVITY, QUALITY OF WORK, SAFETY, AND HEALTH; AND
(15) BIND ALL CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO THE TERMS
OF THE AGREEMENT THROUGH THE INCLUSION OF APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN
ALL RELEVANT SOLICITATION AND CONTRACT DOCUMENTS.
7–1214. 7–1217.
(A) AN ORDER THE COMMISSION ISSUES APPROVING AN APPLICATION FOR
A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT SUBMITTED UNDER § 7–1208 § 7–1212
OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) SPECIFY THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE;
(2) SPECIFY THE DURATION OF THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE,
NOT TO EXCEED 30 YEARS;
(3) PROVIDE THAT:
(I) A PAYMENT MAY NOT BE MADE UNDER A LONG–TERM
PRICING SCHEDULE UNTIL ELECTRICITY SUPPLY IS GENERATED BY THE PROJECT;
AND
(II) RATEPAYERS AND THE STATE SHALL BE HELD HARMLESS
FOR ANY COST OVERRUNS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROJECT; AND
(4) REQUIRE THAT ANY DEBT INSTRUMENT ISSUED IN CONNECTION
WITH THE PROJECT INCLUDE LANGUAGE SPECIFYING THAT THE DEBT INSTRUMENT
DOES NOT ESTABLISH A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF THE STATE.
(B) AN ORDER APPROVING A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT
VESTS THE OWNER OF THE PROJECT WITH THE RIGHT TO RECEIVE PAYMENTS
ACCORDING TO THE TERMS IN THE ORDER.
(C) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND
THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ECONOMIC MATTERS COMMITTEE ON:
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(1) APPLICANT COMPLIANCE WITH THE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS UNDER § 7–1211(C) § 7–1215(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(2) WITH RESPECT TO THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER
§ 7–1213 § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) THE AVAILABILITY AND USE OF OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL
BUSINESSES AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED
BUSINESSES;
(II) THE SUCCESS OF EFFORTS TO PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING
OPPORTUNITIES IN THE MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION
INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, AND MINORITIES; AND
(III) COMPLIANCE WITH THE MINORITY WORKFORCE GOAL
UNDER § 7–1213(B) § 7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1215. 7–1218.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IF IF THE
COMMISSION APPROVES PROPOSALS THAT DEMONSTRATE AN APPLICATION THAT
DEMONSTRATES, BASED ON THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN § 7–1210 § 7–1214 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, POSITIVE NET ECONOMIC, IMPACTS AND ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HEALTH
BENEFITS TO THE STATE, THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE ORDERS TO
FACILITATE THE FINANCING OF NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS ISSUE
AN ORDER IN COMPLIANCE WITH § 7–1217 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) WHEN CALCULATING THE NET BENEFITS TO THE STATE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE
SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS AND EXPERTS.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE ISSUE AN ORDER TO FACILITATE
THE FINANCING OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNLESS THE
PROJECT IS SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER § 7–1213 §
7–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1216. 7–1219.
(A) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM
UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE ARE INCORPORATED IN THIS SECTION.
– 53 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND AUTHORIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES CONSTITUTION, AN APPLICANT APPROVED FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT UNDER § 7–1209 § 7–1213 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL COMPLY
WITH THE STATE’S MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.
(C) (1) WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF AN ORDER THAT
APPROVES A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND INCLUDES A
LONG–TERM PRICING COMPONENT, THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE APPROVED APPLICANT, SHALL ESTABLISH A
CLEAR PLAN FOR SETTING REASONABLE AND APPROPRIATE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS AND PROCEDURES FOR EACH PHASE OF THE
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE GOALS AND PROCEDURES SET
IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON
THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND THE REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THAT SUBTITLE.
(3) EVERY 6 MONTHS FOLLOWING THE ISSUANCE OF AN ORDER THAT
APPROVES A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND INCLUDES A
LONG–TERM PRICING COMPONENT, THE APPROVED APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT ON THE PROGRESS MADE TO ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE GOALS AND PROCEDURES TO THE COMMISSION.
7–1217. 7–1220.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ZERO–EMISSION CREDIT” MEANS THE DIFFERENCE
BETWEEN THE PRICE THAT A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION WITH A
LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE APPROVED IN AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER § 7–1217
OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY RECEIVE ON THE WHOLESALE MARKET AND THE COST OF
CONSTRUCTING THE NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) ESTABLISH THE NUCLEAR ENERGY LONG–TERM PRICING
PURCHASE OBLIGATION SUFFICIENTLY IN ADVANCE TO ALLOW AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY TO REFLECT NUCLEAR ENERGY LONG–TERM PRICING COSTS AS A
NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE PAID BY ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT IS ADDED TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S BASE
DISTRIBUTION RATE ON CUSTOMER BILLS;
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(2) ESTABLISH A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE THAT ALLOWS AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO RECOVER ALL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PURCHASE OF
NUCLEAR ENERGY FROM ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY;
(3) ESTABLISH AN ESCROW ACCOUNT THAT IS UNDER COMMISSION
SUPERVISION; AND
(4) DEFINE RULES THAT FACILITATE AND ENSURE THE SECURE AND
TRANSPARENT TRANSFER OF REVENUES AND LONG–TERM PRICING PAYMENTS
AMONG PARTIES;
(3) DEFINE THE TERMS AND PROCEDURES OF THE NUCLEAR ENERGY
LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE OBLIGATIONS, INCLUDING:
(I) ESTABLISHING A FORMULA AND PROCESS TO ADJUST THE
VALUE OF THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE EVERY 2 YEARS BASED ON
PROJECTED WHOLESALE MARKET PRICES ADJUSTED BY THE LOCATIONAL VALUE
AND EARNING POTENTIAL IN THE PJM REGION OF THE NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATING STATION; AND
(II) ESTABLISHING A PER MEGAWATT HOUR CAP ON ANY
LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE SPECIFIED IN AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER § 7–1217
OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) REQUIRE THE COMMISSION TO ESTABLISH AN ESCROW ACCOUNT;
AND
(5) TO MEET THE TOTAL STATEWIDE LONG–TERM PRICING PURCHASE
OBLIGATION FOR ALL APPLICATIONS APPROVED IN AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER §
7–1217 OF THIS SUBTITLE, REQUIRE THE COMMISSION TO ANNUALLY ESTABLISH
EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY’S ZERO–EMISSION CREDIT PURCHASE OBLIGATION
BASED ON THE MOST RECENT FINAL ELECTRICITY SALES DATA AS REPORTED BY
PJM INTERCONNECTION AND MEASURED AT THE CUSTOMER’S METER IN
PROPORTION TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SHARE OF STATEWIDE LOAD.
(B) (C) (1) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROCURE FROM THE
ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION UNDER THIS SECTION A VOLUME
QUANTITY OF NUCLEAR ENERGY ZERO–EMISSION CREDITS EQUAL TO THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S RESPECTIVE PERCENTAGE OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SALES EACH YEAR.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE
REQUIREMENT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES, IF THERE IS ARE INSUFFICIENT
NUCLEAR ENERGY ZERO–EMISSION CREDITS AVAILABLE TO SATISFY THE ELECTRIC
– 55 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
COMPANIES’ NUCLEAR ENERGY OBLIGATION ZERO–EMISSION CREDIT PURCHASE
OBLIGATIONS, THE OVERPAYMENT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO ELECTRIC
COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER
BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS
SUBJECT TO THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
(II) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE
REQUIREMENT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES, THE CALCULATION OF AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S NUCLEAR ENERGY PURCHASE OBLIGATION SHALL BE BASED
ON FINAL ELECTRICITY SALES DATA AS REPORTED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION AND
MEASURED AT THE CUSTOMER METER.
(3) FOR EACH LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE FOR WHICH A
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT RECEIVES PAYMENT, THE PROJECT
SHALL:
(I) SELL ALL ENERGY, CAPACITY, AND ANCILLARY SERVICES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE CREATION OF THE LONG–TERM PRICING INTO THE MARKETS
OPERATED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE PROCEEDS RECEIVED FROM THE SALES
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED
OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S
CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
(C) (D) A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A LIABILITY OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT OR OF AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A DEBT, AN OBLIGATION, OR A
LIABILITY OF THE STATE.
7–1218. 7–1221.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
TO CARRY OUT THIS PART.
7–1222. RESERVED.
7–1223. RESERVED.
PART IV. TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
7–1224.
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL, BY REGULATION OR ORDER, ESTABLISH A
COMPETITIVE PROCESS FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF PROJECTS FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND DEPLOYMENT OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) (I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ISSUE A PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION FOR APPLICATIONS FOR PROJECTS FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND DEPLOYMENT OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
(II) THE PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION SHALL BE FOR A
MAXIMUM OF 800 MEGAWATTS OF CUMULATIVE ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY, AS
MEASURED IN EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE
A DECISION ON WHETHER TO APPROVE ONE OR MORE PROPOSALS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–1208(B) § 7–1226(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES PROCURED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE OPERATIONAL WITHIN 24 MONTHS
AFTER A PROJECT IS SELECTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE OPERATING DEADLINE
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE
A SECOND PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION FOR THE PROCUREMENT OF PROJECTS
FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND DEPLOYMENT OF FRONT–OF–THE–METER
TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES.
(2) THE PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION SHALL BE FOR A MAXIMUM OF
800 MEGAWATTS OF CUMULATIVE ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY, AS MEASURED IN
EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY.
(3) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE
A DECISION ON WHETHER TO APPROVE ONE OR MORE PROPOSALS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–1226(B) § 7–1226(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES PROCURED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE OPERATIONAL WITHIN 24 MONTHS
AFTER A PROJECT IS SELECTED BY THE COMMISSION.
– 57 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE OPERATING DEADLINE
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
7–1225.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE SPECIFICATIONS IN A
PROCUREMENT SOLICITATION ISSUED UNDER § 7–1224 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT
REQUIRE EACH PROPOSAL TO:
(1) INCLUDE A PROPOSED PRICING SCHEDULE FOR THE
TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE PROJECT THAT:
(I) IS FOR AT LEAST 15 YEARS; AND
(II) REPRESENTS THE ANTICIPATED MONTHLY WHOLESALE
VALUE OF CAPACITY PER MEGAWATT AND OTHER BENEFITS IDENTIFIED IN A
COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS, BUT NOT INCLUDING ANY ANTICIPATED WHOLESALE
ENERGY AND ANCILLARY SERVICES REVENUE;
(2) INCLUDE A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS OF THE PROJECT AND
PROPOSED PRICING SCHEDULE COMPARISON ON A DOLLAR–PER–MEGAWATT–HOUR
BASIS, INCLUDING AN ANALYSIS OF:
(I) THE LOCATIONAL VALUE AND TIME TO DEPLOYMENT OF
THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES;
(II) THE VALUE OF LONG–DURATION STORAGE, INCLUDING ITS
CAPACITY ACCREDITATION VALUE FOR RESOURCE ADEQUACY AS MEASURED IN
PJM INTERCONNECTION’S EFFECTIVE LOAD CARRYING CAPABILITY CLASS
RATINGS;
(III) AVOIDED OR DELAYED TRANSMISSION, GENERATION, AND
DISTRIBUTION COSTS;
(IV) AVOIDED EMISSIONS IN THE SHORT TERM AND PROJECTED
AVOIDED EMISSIONS IN THE LONG TERM, MEASURED USING THE SOCIAL COST OF
CARBON, AS DETERMINED BY THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY AS
OF JANUARY 1, 2025;
(V) THE VALUE OF THE RAPID DEPLOYMENT OF ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICES;
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(VI) THE VALUE OF RELIABILITY DURING PERIODS OF ELECTRIC
SYSTEM STRESS, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO DELIVER CAPACITY DURING PERIODS
OF EXTREME WEATHER, FUEL SCARCITY, AND LARGE UNPLACED UNPLANNED
RESOURCE OUTAGES; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER AVOIDED COSTS;
(3) ENSURE THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE PROJECT HAS
THE CAPABILITY TO EXPORT ELECTRICITY FOR SALE ON THE WHOLESALE MARKET
AND BID INTO THE PJM CAPACITY MARKET UNDER AN AGREEMENT WITH PJM
INTERCONNECTION;
(4) ENSURE THAT THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES CAN DELIVER
THEIR EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY;
(5) INCORPORATE A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT;
(6) ATTEST IN WRITING THAT ALL CONTRACTORS AND
SUBCONTRACTORS WORKING ON THE PROJECT HAVE BEEN IN COMPLIANCE WITH
FEDERAL AND STATE WAGE AND HOUR LAWS FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3
YEARS OR THE DURATION OF THE CONTRACTOR’S OR SUBCONTRACTOR’S BUSINESS
OPERATION, WHICHEVER IS LONGER; AND
(7) ENSURE A COMPETITIVE BIDDING PROCESS, INCLUDING BY
REDACTING PROPRIETARY INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE COMMISSION.
(B) AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE SHALL BE CONSIDERED CAPABLE OF
DELIVERING ITS EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY UNDER THIS SECTION IF:
(1) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE WILL HAVE THE CAPACITY
INTERCONNECTION RIGHTS WITH PJM INTERCONNECTION EQUAL TO ITS
EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY; OR
(2) (I) THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE WILL HAVE SURPLUS
INTERCONNECTION SERVICE WITH PJM INTERCONNECTION; AND
(II) THE ABILITY OF THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE TO DELIVER
ITS EFFECTIVE NAMEPLATE CAPACITY WILL BE LIMITED ONLY BY THE GENERATION
OF ANOTHER NONENERGY STORAGE GENERATION RESOURCE WITH WHICH THE
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE SHARES A POINT OF INTERCONNECTION TO THE
ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM.
(C) FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES
PAIRED WITH TIER 1 OR TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES, AS DEFINED UNDER § 7–701
– 59 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OF THIS TITLE, MAY BE INCLUDED IN A PROPOSAL IN RESPONSE TO A PROCUREMENT
SOLICITATION UNDER § 7–1224 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1226.
(A) IN SELECTING A PROPOSAL FOR A FRONT–OF–THE–METER
TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE PROJECT, THE COMMISSION:
(1) SHALL SPECIFY:
(I) A 15–YEAR PRICING SCHEDULE THAT USES A MONTHLY
FIXED PRICE FOR EACH MEGAWATT THAT REPRESENTS THE ANTICIPATED
WHOLESALE VALUE OF CAPACITY FOR THE FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION
ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE AND THE BENEFITS IDENTIFIED IN § 7–1225(A)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) THAT EACH ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER SHALL BE
RESPONSIBLE FOR PURCHASING STORAGE CAPACITY CREDITS AT THE MONTHLY
FIXED PRICE SCHEDULE PROPORTIONAL TO THE ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER’S
CAPACITY OBLIGATION;
(III) THAT ALL PJM CAPACITY MARKET REVENUE EARNED BY
THE ENERGY STORAGE PROJECT BE TRANSMITTED TO THE COMMISSION TO BE
HELD IN ESCROW FOR DISTRIBUTION TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED
OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER PROPORTIONAL TO THE
ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER’S MONTHLY CAPACITY PURCHASE OBLIGATION;
(IV) THAT THE ENERGY STORAGE PROJECT SHALL RETAIN ANY
ENERGY AND ANCILLARY SERVICES REVENUE EARNED;
(V) THAT ELECTRIC COMPANIES MUST JOINTLY SELECT AN
ESCROW ADMINISTRATOR, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION; AND
(VI) FOR ANY COST RECOVERY BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY, THAT
THE RECOVERY SHALL BE DONE THROUGH A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE
ESTABLISHED BY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT IS ADDED TO THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S BASE DISTRIBUTION RATE OR SUPPLY RATE ON CUSTOMER BILLS.;
(2) SHALL SPECIFY THAT FOR CONTINUED RECEIPT OF PAYMENT
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN APPLICANT SHALL DEMONSTRATE, TO
THE SATISFACTION OF THE COMMISSION, THAT THE APPLICANT’S ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICE IS AVAILABLE;
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(3) SHALL INCORPORATE PENALTIES FOR NONPERFORMANCE AND
UNDERPERFORMANCE IN THE CONTRACT, INCLUDING WITHHOLDING OF PAYMENT
THAT REFLECTS THE DEGREE OF UNDERPERFORMANCE, FOR ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICES THAT FAIL TO MEET AVAILABILITY METRICS;
(4) MAY TERMINATE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES FROM THE PROGRAM
IF DEVICE PERFORMANCE DOES NOT IMPROVE AFTER APPROPRIATE NOTICE AND
OPPORTUNITY TO CURE;
(5) SHALL CONSIDER OTHER NONPRICE FACTORS TO ENSURE
PROJECT DELIVERABILITY WITHIN 24 MONTHS AFTER THE AWARD DATE, SUCH AS:
(I) PROJECT MATURITY DATES;
(II) INTERCONNECTION QUEUE STATUS;
(III) SITE CONTROL;
(IV) DEVELOPER EXPERIENCE, INCLUDING PROCURING,
CONSTRUCTING, AND OPERATING FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION ENERGY
STORAGE DEVICES;
(V) ANY EVIDENCE OF KEY DEVELOPMENT MILESTONES TO
SUBSTANTIATE PROJECT DELIVERABILITY WITHIN 24 MONTHS AFTER THE AWARD
DATE;
(VI) SAFETY PLANS; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER RELEVANT NONPRICE FACTORS AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION; AND
(6) SHALL REQUIRE, AT A MINIMUM, ALL ENERGY STORAGE DEVICES
THAT UTILIZE LITHIUM–ION BATTERIES TO COMPLY WITH THE MOST UP–TO–DATE
REVISION OF THE NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION 855: STANDARD FOR
THE INSTALLATION OF STATIONARY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS IN EFFECT AT THE
PROJECT’S FINAL PERMIT APPLICATION DATE.
(B) (1) EACH ENERGY STORAGE PROJECT SHALL INCLUDE A PROPOSED
DECOMMISSIONING PLAN.
(2) THE PROPOSED DECOMMISSIONING PLAN SHALL INCLUDE A PLAN
TO MAXIMIZE THE RECYCLING OR REUSE OF ALL QUALIFYING COMPONENTS OF
EACH ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE.
– 61 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE MAY
SUBMIT A REVISED RECYCLING AND REUSE PLAN THAT INCORPORATES EMERGING
RECYCLING AND REUSE OPPORTUNITIES UP TO 1 YEAR BEFORE EXECUTING THE
DECOMMISSIONING PLAN.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) AFTER GIVING PUBLIC NOTICE, HOLD ONE OR MORE PUBLIC
HEARINGS TO RECEIVE PUBLIC COMMENT AND EVALUATE THE PROPOSALS; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, ISSUE ONE OR
MORE ORDERS TO SELECT A PROPOSAL OR PROPOSALS FOR DEVELOPMENT.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY END THE SOLICITATION PROCESS WITHOUT
SELECTING A PROPOSAL IF THE COMMISSION FINDS THAT NONE OF THE PROPOSALS
ADEQUATELY SUPPORT THE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING THE GOAL OF SECURING AFFORDABLE, RELIABLE ELECTRICAL SERVICE
FOR MARYLAND RESIDENTS.
7–1227.
(A) FOR ANY PROPOSAL SELECTED UNDER THIS PART, THE COMMISSION
MAY ADOPT CONDITIONS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF FACILITIES
INCLUDED IN THE PROPOSAL.
(B) AN ORDER SELECTING A PROPOSAL UNDER § 7–1226 OF THIS SUBTITLE
BESTOWS THE SAME RIGHTS TO THE SELECTED PROPOSAL THAT A GENERATING
SYSTEM WOULD OTHERWISE BE GRANTED THROUGH A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS TITLE IF THE SELECTED
PROPOSAL IS REVIEWED UNDER AN ALTERNATIVE PROCESS AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION.
7–1228.
ANY TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE BUILT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL COUNT TOWARD THE ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE
DEPLOYMENT GOALS UNDER § 7–216.2 OF THIS TITLE.
7–1229.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PROCUREMENT PROCESS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS PART.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–102.
(a) The following procurement methods are authorized at the procurement
officer’s discretion, where applicable:
(1) competitive sealed bids under § 13–103 of this subtitle;
(2) competitive sealed proposals under § 13–104 or § 13–105 of this
subtitle;
(3) noncompetitive negotiation under § 13–106 of this subtitle;
(4) sole source procurement under § 13–107 of this subtitle;
(5) emergency or expedited procurement under § 13–108 of this subtitle;
(6) small procurement under § 13–109 of this subtitle;
(7) an intergovernmental cooperative purchasing agreement under §
13–110 of this subtitle;
(8) auction bids under § 13–111 of this subtitle;
(9) architectural, engineering, and land surveying services qualification
based selection under § 13–112 of this subtitle;
(10) master contracting under § 13–113 of this subtitle; [or]
(11) pay–for–success contracting under § 13–112.1 of this subtitle; OR
(12) LEGISLATIVE FAST–TRACK PROCUREMENTS UNDER § 13–117 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
13–117.
(A) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO:
(1) RECOGNIZE THE NEED FOR STATE AGENCIES TO BE RESPONSIVE
TO THE REQUESTS AND LEGISLATIVE DIRECTIVES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
– 63 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) REDUCE THE TIME IT TAKES FOR STATE AGENCIES TO PROCURE
CONSULTANTS TO ASSIST WITH LEGISLATIVE MANDATES THAT HAVE DEADLINES
SPECIFIED IN LAW; AND
(3) BE TIMELY IN ADDRESSING CLIMATE CHANGE, ENVIRONMENTAL,
ENERGY, AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS RELATED ISSUES.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE PROCUREMENT OF CONSULTANTS
THAT:
(1) ARE LEGISLATIVELY MANDATED WITH SPECIFIC TIME FRAMES
ESTABLISHED IN LAW; AND
(2) WILL ADDRESS ISSUES RELATED ONLY TO CLIMATE CHANGE, THE
ENVIRONMENT, ENERGY, AND GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS.
(C) THE FOLLOWING UNITS ARE AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE COMPETITIVE
SEALED BIDS HIGHER THAN THEIR DESIGNATED SMALL PROCUREMENT
DELEGATION AUTHORITIES:
(1) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION;
(2) THE OFFICE OF PEOPLE’S COUNSEL;
(3) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION;
(4) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT; AND
(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES.
(D) BEFORE AWARDING A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL OBTAIN THE APPROVAL OF:
(1) THE HEAD OF THE UNIT; AND
(2) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THEIR DESIGNEE.
(E) (1) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THEIR DESIGNEE,
SHALL APPROVE A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION IF
IT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THEIR DESIGNEE,
DOES NOT APPROVE A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE CONTRACT, THE CONTRACT SHALL
BE CONSIDERED APPROVED.
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(3) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans made
from the Fund;
(4) interest and investment earnings on the Fund;
(5) compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article;
(6) money received from any public or private source for the benefit of the
Fund;
(7) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under [§
7–207.2(c)(3)] § 7–207.2(D)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; and
(8) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article.
(i) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may be
used only to make loans and grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable energy
sources in the State that are owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities
Article shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make
– 65 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
loans and grants to support the creation of new solar energy sources in the State that are
owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article; or
(iii) households with low to moderate income, as defined in § 9–2016
of this title.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II), (III), AND (IV) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, COMPLIANCE FEES PAID UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE MAY BE USED TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE
REFUNDED OR CREDITED TO EACH RESIDENTIAL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER BASED
ON THE CUSTOMER’S CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS SUBJECT TO
THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
(II) THE REFUNDING OR CREDITING OF AMOUNTS TO
RESIDENTIAL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS SHALL BE IDENTIFIED ON THE
CUSTOMER’S BILL AS A LINE ITEM IDENTIFIED AS A “LEGISLATIVE ENERGY
HARDSHIP CREDIT RELIEF REFUND”.
(III) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY AWARDED A GRANT UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY NOT RETAIN ANY OF THE GRANT FUNDS TO
COVER OVERHEAD EXPENSES; AND
2. SHALL PROVIDE ALL OF THE GRANT FUNDS TO
RESIDENTIAL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS.
(IV) THE PROCESS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPHS (I) AND (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH RELATED TO THE REFUNDING OR CREDITING OF AMOUNTS TO
RESIDENTIAL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS SHALL BE DIRECTED AND OVERSEEN BY
THE COMMISSION.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(QQ) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “LEGISLATIVE ENERGY HARDSHIP CREDIT
RELIEF REFUND” MEANS A CREDIT AGAINST A PERSON’S ELECTRIC UTILITY BILL
THAT IS OFFERED THROUGH GRANTS PROVIDED TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–20B–05(I)(3) OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES THE AMOUNT OF A LEGISLATIVE ENERGY HARDSHIP CREDIT RELIEF
REFUND RECEIVED BY A PERSON DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.
SECTION 4. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(s) “Tier 1 renewable source” means one or more of the following types of energy
sources:
(1) solar energy, including energy from photovoltaic technologies and solar
water heating systems;
(2) wind;
(3) qualifying biomass;
(4) methane from the anaerobic decomposition of organic materials in a
landfill or wastewater treatment plant;
(5) geothermal, including energy generated through geothermal exchange
from or thermal energy avoided by, groundwater or a shallow ground source;
(6) ocean, including energy from waves, tides, currents, and thermal
differences;
(7) a fuel cell that produces electricity from a Tier 1 renewable source
under item (3) or (4) of this subsection;
– 67 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) a small hydroelectric power plant of less than 30 megawatts in capacity
that is licensed or exempt from licensing by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(9) poultry litter–to–energy;
(10) [waste–to–energy;
(11) refuse–derived fuel;
(12)] thermal energy from a thermal biomass system; and
[(13)] (11) raw or treated wastewater used as a heat source or sink for a
heating or cooling system.
7–704.
(a) (1) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source:
(i) is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio
standard regardless of when the generating system or facility was placed in service; and
(ii) may be applied to the percentage requirements of the standard
for either Tier 1 renewable sources or Tier 2 renewable sources.
(2) (i) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under § 7–701(s)(1), (5),
OR (9)[, (10), or (11)] of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy
portfolio standard only if the source is connected with the electric distribution grid serving
Maryland.
(ii) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(13)] §
7–701(S)(11) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy
portfolio standard only if the source:
1. is connected with the electric distribution grid serving
Maryland; or
2. processes wastewater from Maryland residents.
(iii) If the owner of a solar generating system in this State chooses to
sell solar renewable energy credits from that system, the owner must first offer the credits
for sale to an electricity supplier or electric company that shall apply them toward
compliance with the renewable energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle.
(3) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under § 7–701(s)(8) of this
subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard if it is
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
generated at a dam that existed as of January 1, 2004, even if a system or facility that is
capable of generating electricity did not exist on that date.
(4) Energy from a Tier 2 renewable source under § 7–701(t) of this subtitle
is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard if it is generated
at a system or facility that existed and was operational as of January 1, 2004, even if the
facility or system was not capable of generating electricity on that date.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(b) (1) (i) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; [or]
2. a qualified generator lead line; OR
3. AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE THAT IS PART OF A
PROPOSAL ACCEPTED BY THE COMMISSION DURING A SOLICITATION PERIOD
UNDER § 7–1202 APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS TITLE.
(IV) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS
SECTION, A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION OF A GENERATING STATION THAT IS PART OF A PROPOSAL
ACCEPTED BY THE COMMISSION DURING A SOLICITATION PERIOD UNDER § 7–1202
APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS TITLE SHALL BE ISSUED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(V) WHEN A PERSON APPLIES FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A GENERATING
STATION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE APPLICATION SHALL STATE WHETHER THE
PROPOSED GENERATING STATION OR THE PROPOSED MODIFICATION IS PART OF A
PROPOSAL ACCEPTED BY THE COMMISSION DURING A SOLICITATION PERIOD
UNDER § 7–1202 OF THIS TITLE. APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1206
OF THIS TITLE.
(VI) 1. THE COMMISSION MAY PRIORITIZE THE REVIEW OF
AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
– 69 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE OVER THE REVIEW OF AN APPLICATION FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION.
2. THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR THE
REVIEW OF AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION IF, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION HAS PRIORITIZED THE REVIEW OF AN
APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
UNDER § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE OVER THE REVIEW OF THE APPLICATION FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–207.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) “DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATING GENERATION
PROJECT” MEANS A GENERATING STATION OR ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE:
1. THAT IS PART OF A PROPOSAL ACCEPTED BY THE
COMMISSION DURING A SOLICITATION PERIOD UNDER § 7–1202 OF THIS TITLE; OR
2. ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025, IS WAITING FOR
APPROVAL OR HAS BEEN APPROVED FOR INTERCONNECTION BY PJM THAT IS PART
OF A PROPOSAL APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) “DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATING GENERATION
PROJECT” INCLUDES ANY ASSOCIATED INFRASTRUCTURE NECESSARY TO
INTERCONNECT THE GENERATING STATION TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM.
(4) “ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–216 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(5) “GENERATING STATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(6) “LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE” MEANS A GENERATING
STATION THAT:
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025:
1. HAS APPLIED TO PJM FOR INTERCONNECTION
APPROVAL; OR
2. HAS BEEN APPROVED BY PJM FOR
INTERCONNECTION;
(II) HAS A CAPACITY RATING EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN 20
MEGAWATTS AFTER ACCOUNTING FOR THE EFFECTIVE LOAD CARRYING
CAPABILITY; AND
(III) IS PART OF A PROPOSAL APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS TITLE.
(7) “QUALIFYING PROJECT” MEANS A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT OR LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE PROJECT THAT
HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER § 7–1208 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE
OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A
DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION QUALIFYING PROJECT.
(C) UNLESS A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY IS
FIRST OBTAINED FROM THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION OR
§ 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON MAY NOT CONSTRUCT A DISPATCHABLE
ENERGY GENERATION QUALIFYING PROJECT.
(D) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE SUBMISSION OF AN APPLICATION FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY THAT STATES THAT THE
APPLICATION IS FOR A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT, THE
COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) VERIFY THAT THE GENERATING STATION OR ENERGY STORAGE
DEVICE IS A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT; AND
(2) NOTIFY THE APPLICANT AND RELEVANT ENTITIES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT THE APPLICATION IS
SUBJECT TO AN EXPEDITED REVIEW PROCESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(D) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION BESTOWS THE SAME RIGHTS AS A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY ISSUED UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 71 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) A PERSON APPLYING FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) AT LEAST 45 DAYS BEFORE SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION UNDER
THIS SECTION, NOTIFY THE COMMISSION AND THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM; AND
(2) UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED UNDER THIS SECTION, COMPLETE
ALL PRE–APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS BEFORE SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION.
(F) ONCE FIVE APPLICATIONS HAVE BEEN RECEIVED UNDER THIS SECTION
WITHIN A 2–MONTH PERIOD, THE COMMISSION MAY DELAY PROCESSING ANY
SUBSEQUENT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION WITHOUT
IMPACTING THE TIMELINES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE TIMELINES ASSOCIATED WITH THE NORMAL PRE–APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS
UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER COMAR
20.79.01.04 AND COMAR 20.79.01.05, SHALL BE SHORTENED TO 45 DAYS FOR
APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF A QUALIFYING PROJECT IS IN AN
OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY OR UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY, AS DEFINED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, THE TIMELINE FOR THE PRE–APPLICATION
REQUIREMENTS UNDER COMAR 20.79.01.04 AND COMAR 20.79.01.05 SHALL
REMAIN AT 90 DAYS.
(G) ONCE FIVE APPLICATIONS HAVE BEEN RECEIVED UNDER THIS SECTION
WITHIN A 2–MONTH PERIOD, THE COMMISSION MAY DELAY PROCESSING ANY
SUBSEQUENT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION WITHOUT
IMPACTING THE TIMELINES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION.
(E) (G) (H) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) EXPEDITE ALL PROCEEDINGS FOR THE REVIEW AND
APPROVAL OF A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR A
DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND PRIORITIZE THESE
PROCEEDINGS, IF NECESSARY, OVER OTHER MATTERS; AND QUALIFYING PROJECT;
AND
(II) TAKE FINAL ACTION ON A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION
QUALIFYING PROJECT NOT LATER THAN 6 MONTHS 295 DAYS AFTER THE
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
COMMISSION MAKES THE VERIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS
SECTION THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM DETERMINES THAT THE
APPLICATION IS COMPLETE IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMAR 20.79.01.10.
(2) A STATE AGENCY SHALL SUBMIT ANY RECOMMENDED LICENSING
CONDITIONS OR TESTIMONY REGARDING THE ISSUANCE OF A CERTIFICATE OF
PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT NOT LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE COMMISSION MAKES THE
VERIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION THE COMMISSION MAY
EXTEND THE TIME TO TAKE FINAL ACTION ON A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION IF AN APPLICANT FAILS TO
COMPLY WITH THE LAW, REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS, OR COMMISSION ORDERS
ASSOCIATED WITH OBTAINING A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND
NECESSITY.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW OR REGULATION, IN ORDER
TO MEET THE REQUIRED TIMELINES FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A CERTIFICATE OF
PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION
MAY REVIEW AND DETERMINE WHETHER TO APPROVE DECOMMISSIONING PLANS
FOR A QUALIFYING PROJECT AFTER THE CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY HAS BEEN ISSUED.
(F) (H) (1) IF A PROPOSED SITE FOR A DISPATCHABLE ENERGY
GENERATION QUALIFYING PROJECT WAS PREVIOUSLY OR IS CURRENTLY USED FOR
ELECTRICITY GENERATION AND HAS A HIGHER GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION
PROFILE COMPARED TO THE DISPATCHABLE ENERGY GENERATION QUALIFYING
PROJECT:
(1) THE APPLICANT IS EXEMPT FROM THE, THE TIMELINES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE PRE–APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS OF COMAR 20.79.01.04
AND COMAR 20.79.01.05; AND
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PRESUME THE PROPOSED SITE IS
APPROPRIATE AND CONSISTENT WITH THE CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY FOR A NEW OR EXPANDED GENERATING STATION SHALL BE
SHORTENED TO 45 DAYS FOR APPLICATIONS FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMISSION TO CONDITION OR REQUIRE
COMPLIANCE WITH STANDARDS FOR A NEW OR EXPANDED GENERATING STATION AT
THE PROPOSED SITE.
– 73 –

Ch. 625 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(G) THE COMMISSION, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, AND ANY OTHER IMPACTED STATE
AGENCY SHALL WAIVE OR EXPEDITE ANY REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS OR
DECISIONS TO COMPLY WITH THE TIME FRAMES SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.
(I) IN EVALUATING AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY
CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS AND EXPERTS.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before January 15, 2026,
the Public Service Commission shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) the status of developing regulations for the establishment and purchase
of zero–emission credits in accordance with § 7–1217 § 7–1220 of the Public Utilities Article,
as enacted by Section 3 of this Act; and
(2) whether any legislative action is necessary to implement the
zero–emission credit provisions in § 7–1217 § 7–1220 of the Public Utilities Article, as
enacted by Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 5 of this Act shall
apply:
(1) except as specified in item (2) of this section, to all renewable energy
portfolio standard compliance years starting on or after January 1, 2025; and
(2) beginning July 1, 2026, and to each renewable energy portfolio standard
compliance year thereafter, for each facility owned by a public instrumentality of the State.
SECTION 5. 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
supports the extension or renewal of the Federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission license
for the Calvert Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant’s nuclear reactors in the years 2034 and 2036.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from the alternative
compliance fees paid into the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund in accordance
with § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article, a portion shall be used to provide grant awards
to electric companies, including electric cooperatives and municipal electric utilities, to be
refunded or credited to residential distribution customers for electric service in fiscal 2026
in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
– 74 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 625
(2) The Governor may transfer by budget amendment the funds described
in paragraph (1) of this subsection to the Public Service Commission to be awarded to
electric companies, including electric cooperatives and municipal electric utilities.
(b) The funds described in subsection (a)(1) of this section shall be distributed:
(1) in accordance with § 9–20B–05(i)(3) of the State Government Article,
as enacted by Section 3 of this Act;
(2) twice during the 2026 fiscal year; and
(3) to residential distribution customers as follows:
(i) half of the amount granted under subsection (a)(1) to be refunded
or credited during a peak summer month; and
(ii) half of the amount granted under subsection (a)(1) to be refunded
or credited during a peak winter month.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 4 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025 2024.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1,
2026, the Department of Human Services shall report to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on any legislative or
regulatory changes necessary to implement the recommendation to combine all energy
assistance programs operated by the State into one program as discussed in the
Department of Legislative Services Office of Program Evaluation and Government
Accountability’s February 2025 “Evaluation of the Office of Home Energy Programs”.
SECTION 6. 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July June 1, 2025. Section 4 6 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and
1 month and, at the end of June 30, 2030, Section 4 6 of this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 75 –